David de Gea Quintana (Spanish pronunciation: [dai e xea kintana]; born 7 November 1990) is a Spanish professional footballer who plays as a goalkeeper for English club Manchester United and the Spain national team.
Born in Madrid, he started his career aged 13 with Atltico Madrid and rose through the academy system at the club before making his senior debut in 2009. After being made Atltico's first-choice goalkeeper, he helped the team win both the UEFA Europa League and the UEFA Super Cup in 2010. His performances attracted the attention of Manchester United, whom he joined in June 2011 for 17.8 million, a British record for a goalkeeper.
Since joining United, he has made over 100 appearances and won one Premier League winners medal, in 2013. He has been hailed as one of the best goalkeepers in the world.
De Gea was the captain for the Spain under-21 national side which won the European Championship in 2011 and 2013, and also competed in the 2012 Olympics. He made his debut for the senior team in 2014 and was selected for that year's World Cup, and has been tipped by many as the successor to Iker Casillas as Spain's long-term goalkeeper.


== Club careerEdit ==


=== Atltico MadridEdit ===
Born in Madrid and raised in the town of Illescas, De Gea joined Atltico Madrid at the age of 13 when his then-coach Juan Luis Martn lied to the club that Rayo Vallecano were set to sign him. A few days later, Diego Daz Garrido scouted De Gea and signed him immediately. He eventually made his way up through the youth ranks at the club before signing his first professional contract in 2008, aged 17, contracting him to Atltico until 2011. He spent his second season for Atltico Madrid B in Segunda Divisin B. In the summer of 2009, De Gea was approached by Numancia and English team Queens Park Rangers with regards to a loan move, with Atltico sporting director Jess Garca Pitarch pushing for him to move to Numancia. De Gea rejected the approach, and was punished by being forced to train by himself. Weeks later, Atltico manager Abel Resino noticed De Gea training alone and invited him to train with the first team, where he was rated as the third-choice goalkeeper. The same summer, Atltico rejected an offer from English team Wigan Athletic for a permanent transfer for De Gea.
With first-choice goalkeeper Sergio Asenjo away on international duty at the 2009 FIFA U-20 World Cup, De Gea was called up to the senior side as cover for Roberto. He made his debut for the Atltico first-team at the age of 18 on 30 September 2009, coming on as a substitute after Roberto was injured after 27 minutes of Atltico's UEFA Champions League Group Stage match away to FC Porto; De Gea conceded two late goals as Atltico lost 20. Roberto's injury meant that De Gea was given his La Liga debut three days later, at home to Real Zaragoza; he gave away a penalty kick in the 19th minute, but immediately redeemed himself by saving Marko Babi's attempt in an eventual 21 win. He described starting at the Vicente Caldern Stadium as a "dream since childhood". In January 2010, De Gea was touted as a possible replacement for Manchester United goalkeeper Edwin van der Sar, who was set to retire in 2011. Days later, however, he signed a new contract which would keep him with Atltico until 2013.
After some costly mistakes by Asenjo, and the arrival of Quique Flores as manager, De Gea finished the 200910 season as the starting "number one". He won two man of the match awards along the way, against Athletic Bilbao and Valencia CF. Additionally, he appeared in eight games in the club's victorious UEFA Europa League campaign, including the 21 final win against Fulham. Diego Forln later said of his first season: "David was good enough for the top level at 19 and the players had confidence in him".

De Gea started 201011 in impressive fashion, helping Atltico win the season's UEFA Super Cup. In the 90th minute of the 20 win against Internazionale, he saved a Diego Milito penalty kick. In September, it was reported that Manchester United manager Alex Ferguson had missed a League Cup game with Scunthorpe United to travel to Spain to watch De Gea in action against Valencia. De Gea played down the rumours, saying "The important thing is that I have a contract here and I'm an Atletico player until 2013".

Following his "faultless" performance in the Madrid derby on 7 November, De Gea was hailed as the heir apparent to Real Madrid's goalkeeper Iker Casillas for Spain, a sentiment Casillas agreed with, saying "In Spain we are lucky to have very good goalkeepers and De Gea soon be fighting my place in the team", while Spain manager Vicente Del Bosque described De Gea as "the future of the team". He remained the undisputed starting goalkeeper for the remainder of the season, going on to play in every La Liga game for the team en route to a seventh-place finish.


=== Manchester UnitedEdit ===
Throughout the 201011 season, speculation regarding how Manchester United would replace their retiring goalkeeper Edwin van der Sar was widespread, and much attention focused on De Gea as United's key target. After Gary Neville's testimonial against Juventus on 24 May, United manager Sir Alex Ferguson claimed that a deal had been done to bring De Gea to Old Trafford, but this was later denied by the player's representatives and the Atltico management, with De Gea stating that he would not consider his future until after the UEFA Under-21 Championship. Following Spain's victory in the tournament, De Gea was spotted in Manchester undergoing a medical with United on 27 June. The next day, he reported that United were making him a contract offer, and the transfer was confirmed on 29 June for a British record fee for a goalkeeper of around 17.8 million.
Growing up, De Gea had admired United goalkeeper Peter Schmeichel, and was often compared to Van der Sar, furthered by being dubbed "Van der Gea".


==== 201112 seasonEdit ====

De Gea made his first appearance for Manchester United in a 31 friendly win over Chicago Fire on 23 July 2011. He made his competitive debut for United against Manchester City in the Community Shield on 7 August. Despite being caught out in the first half by a header from Joleon Lescott and a long range Edin Deko strike that put City into a 20 lead, United rallied in the second half and won 32. De Gea made his league debut for Manchester United against West Bromwich Albion a week later, where he received criticism for failing to save Shane Long's goal during a 21 United victory, which Ferguson described as "a learning process". De Gea kept his first clean sheet for United on his Old Trafford debut in the following fixture, a 30 victory against Tottenham Hotspur. In the following game, six days later, De Gea saved a penalty from Arsenal captain Robin van Persie, which would have cancelled out United's 10 lead. He made further saves to deny Van Persie and Andrei Arshavin in United's 82 victory. Teammate Wayne Rooney backed De Gea to succeed at United and hailed him as a "strong character".

On 18 September, Manchester United beat Chelsea 31 at Old Trafford, with De Gea making a string of impressive saves, particularly from Ramires  when the midfielder had an empty net to side-foot home, De Gea quickly got across to smother the ball away. De Gea's improvement in form continued in his next game, as he made two stunning saves to help his side to a 11 draw away at Stoke City, and his overall performance was praised by team-mates Patrice Evra and Darren Fletcher. De Gea made his first ever UEFA Champions League start in a 33 draw against FC Basel on 27 September 2011. On 15 October, De Gea was praised for his efforts at Anfield as United drew 11 against Liverpool, providing important saves in a nerve-free performance, prompting Liverpool manager Kenny Dalglish to joke "I thought the press said the boy was struggling".
On 23 October 2011, he played as Manchester United suffered their worst home defeat since 1955 with a 61 loss against cross-town rivals Manchester City, the first time United had conceded six at home since 1930. De Gea was in goal during the league defeat to Blackburn Rovers and was blamed by most media for failing to deal with an aerial ball which led to the conceding a late goal to Grant Hanley in a 32 defeat. De Gea was nonplussed by the error, saying "all keepers make mistakes once in a while and none of us like it when we do. I have every intention of spending many years here at Manchester United. I want to become a great United keeper and I want to earn and deserve the respect I hope to get", and spoke of his intentions of surpassing his predecessor, "Hopefully, I will equal or even surpass the performance and contribution Edwin van der Sar made to the club". After this game, De Gea was dropped and replaced by United's second-choice keeper, Anders Lindegaard. An injury to Lindegaard saw De Gea return to the starting line-up for a 33 draw with Chelsea at Stamford Bridge on 5 February 2012. De Gea later cited his last-minute save from Juan Mata during this match as the turning point in his season, as he went on to play the club's last 19 matches, keeping eight clean sheets.
After a difficult first season in England, De Gea said "There have been doubts in the first season but I always had faith in my ability. The pressure at an elite club like United is huge but Ferguson just told me to do what I did at Atletico. You have to be as strong when things go wrong but I don't get nervous. Mistakes are normal; everyone makes them". His goalkeeping rival Lindegaard, however, promised to fight for the place he lost via injury, saying "I want the number one spot because I am the best. I am sure he is a bit in front right now because he did well last season, so I need to take every chance I get to prove myself worthy of the number one spot". De Gea later admitted that he thought about leaving after the first season.


==== 201213 seasonEdit ====
Due to his involvement in the 2012 Olympics, De Gea missed Manchester United's pre-season tour, but nevertheless returned to the starting line-up for the opening game of the season against Everton. Despite some "outstanding" saves from De Gea, United lost 10. In the next game, a 32 win at home to Fulham, he made some noteworthy saves from Mladen Petri, Mousa Dembl, and Bryan Ruiz; in attempting to claim a cross from Matthew Briggs, however, a misunderstanding with Nemanja Vidi led to the Serbian defender putting the ball in his own net for Fulham's second goal.

On 9 December, De Gea made back-to-back saves from Manchester City's Carlos Tevez and David Silva, helping United to a 32 Manchester Derby win at the City of Manchester Stadium. In the next match, a 31 win against Sunderland at Old Trafford, De Gea produced an important double-save from Craig Gardner and Stphane Sessgnon's follow-up.
De Gea received criticism from former United captain Gary Neville for a punch which allowed Tottenham Hotspur to score a stoppage time equaliser in a 11 draw at White Hart Lane on 20 January 2013, saying: "You've got to learn the hard way and he's learning in a very unforgiving environment where he's judged continuously at the highest level. There's a theory that he saved Manchester United because he made two or three great saves, but unfortunately that's a waste of time. He played well yesterday, but playing well for 92-and-a-half minutes and then doing that in the 93rd is a problem at a club like that". Ferguson responded by saying De Gea's critics were "idiots". On 13 February 2013, De Gea made several saves to help United to a 11 draw against Real Madrid at the Santiago Bernabu in the first leg of the last-16 of the Champions League, and was praised by manager Alex Ferguson for his "excellent" performance, one which was said to have turned him from "villain to hero" and made him "come of age".

On 23 February, De Gea recorded his second consecutive clean sheet for United, stopping a Loc Rmy shot and a Christopher Samba header to help United to 20 victory over Queens Park Rangers. This was followed by a 40 win at Old Trafford against Norwich City on 2 March. Another clean sheet came on 16 March in a 10 victory against Reading. De Gea was on the receiving end of a controversial aerial challenge by West Ham United striker Andy Carroll that left him "poleaxed", with Ferguson expressing his disbelief at the lack of a red card.
De Gea's form throughout the season was recognised by his peers, culminating in being voted into the PFA Premier League Team of the Year. De Gea ended the season with his first Premier League winner's medal with United, making 28 appearances and keeping 11 clean sheets, as the team topped the Premier League table by 11 points. This placed him joint-fifth in the race for the Premier League Golden Glove.


==== 201314 seasonEdit ====

De Gea's season began with a clean sheet in the 20 win over Wigan Athletic in the Community Shield at Wembley. On 5 October 2013, De Gea's save to deny Sunderland's Emanuele Giaccherini during a 21 away win was described by former Manchester United goalkeeper Peter Schmeichel, as one of the best saves ever seen in the Premier League. Manager David Moyes agreed with Schmeichel's assessment, describing the save was a "turning point" in a game in which they were losing 10 at the time, and said De Gea "is improving all the time".
On 1 December, he made his 100th appearance for Manchester United in a 22 draw against Tottenham Hotspur. He received the backing of team-mate Darren Fletcher, when, in the League Cup semi-final second leg against Sunderland on 22 January 2014, De Gea was deemed to be at fault when he let a weak Phil Bardsley shot past him deep into extra-time; a Javier Hernndez goal soon after left the aggregate score at 33, resulting in a penalty shoot-out, where De Gea's penalty saves from Steven Fletcher and Adam Johnson weren't enough to help United advance, losing 21. On 20 March, whilst playing against Olympiacos in the first knockout stage of the Champions League as United came from 20 down to win 32 on aggregate, De Gea made a crucial double-save before half-time which was said to have defied "all known laws of physics and physiology" in a performance described as "magnificent". Teammate Phil Jones claimed that "he's up there with the best goalkeepers in the world". De Gea's performances throughout the season saw him named as both the club's Players' Player of the Year and Fans' Player of the Year.


==== 201415 seasonEdit ====

De Gea helped United secure back-to-back victories for the first time under their new manager Louis van Gaal in a home victory against Everton on 5 October 2014. During the match, De Gea made three important saves, including one penalty from Leighton Baines, to help United secure a 21 win in which he was voted by Manchester United fans as man of the match. He became the first goalkeeper to stop a penalty from Baines, who had previously converted all of his 14 Premier League penalties. After several vital stops against Everton, West Brom and Chelsea, he was named Manchester United's Player of the Month for October. On 14 December, De Gea was awarded the man of the match for his "outstanding" performance against Liverpool, making eight saves in a 30 victory, a performance rated as the best of the Premier League season. He was hailed by manager Louis van Gaal as "unbelievable" for his performances, and was called the "saving grace" for being the one constant in the team throughout the season. Amid rumours of a departure, he said he was "proud" to play for United, and was prompted by Peter Schmciehel and Gary Neville to sign a new contract with the club.
At the end of the season, he was shortlisted for the PFA Players' Player of the Year and the PFA Young Player of the Year, before losing out to Eden Hazard and Harry Kane respectively. On 26 April 2015, De Gea was named in the PFA Team of the Year, as its goalkeeper and only Manchester United player. He also won both Fans' Player of the Year and Players' Player of the Year awards for the second consecutive season. His save against Everton was voted as Premier League Save of the Season by Match of the Day, the second consecutive year he won the award.


== International careerEdit ==

De Gea helped Spain's under-17 team win the 2007 European Championship, and finish second at the 2007 World Cup. In early May 2010, courtesy of solid Atltico performances, he was named by senior squad manager Vicente del Bosque in a provisional 30-man squad for the 2010 FIFA World Cup; however, he did not make the final cut. In 2011, he was part of the Spain under-21 team that won the 2011 European Championship. On 15 May 2012, De Gea was called up for to the Spanish senior side for two matches against Serbia and the People's Republic of China. He was in consideration for Del Bosque's Euro 2012 squad, but did not make the final 23-man group. He was selected, however, to play at the London 2012 Olympics, and played all three matches as the nation was eliminated in the group stage. De Gea and Spain under-21 retained their European title in 2013.
On 13 May 2014, De Gea was selected in Spain's 30-man provisional squad for the World Cup, and later made the final squad. He made his first senior international appearance against El Salvador in a 20 friendly victory on 8 June in preparation for the tournament, replacing Iker Casillas for the last seven minutes of the game at the FedEx Field in Washington, D.C. As third-choice goalkeeper behind Casillas and Pepe Reina, De Gea was the only member of the squad not to feature at that World Cup, in which Spain were eliminated in the group stage. On 4 September 2014, he made his first start for Spain, playing the whole 90 minutes against France in a Paris friendly and conceding a goal from Loc Rmy to lose 10. He played his first competitive international on his third cap on 12 October, keeping a clean sheet in a 40 win away to Luxembourg in UEFA Euro 2016 qualifying.
He has been tipped by many to succeed Iker Casillas as the long-term number one goalkeeper, including Casillas himself.


== Personal lifeEdit ==
In January 2012, De Gea was confirmed as hyperopic, although this is not thought to have affected his performances for United. He is in a relationship with Edurne Garcia, a singer who represented Spain in the Eurovision Song Contest 2015.


== Career statisticsEdit ==


=== ClubEdit ===
As of match played on 17 May 2015.


=== InternationalEdit ===
As of match played 11 June 2015.


== HonoursEdit ==


=== ClubEdit ===
Atltico Madrid
UEFA Europa League: 200910
UEFA Super Cup: 2010
Manchester United
Premier League: 201213
FA Community Shield: 2011, 2013


=== InternationalEdit ===
Spain U17
UEFA European Under-17 Football Championship: 2007
Spain U21
UEFA European Under-21 Football Championship: 2011, 2013


=== IndividualEdit ===
UEFA U-21 Championship Team of the Tournament: 2011, 2013
Premier League PFA Team of the Year: 201213, 201415
Sir Matt Busby Player of the Year: 201314, 201415
Manchester United Players' Player of the Year: 201314, 201415


== ReferencesEdit ==


== External linksEdit ==
Manchester United profile
BDFutbol profile
David de Gea career statistics at Soccerbase
David de Gea  UEFA competition record
David de Gea  FIFA competition recordFaustino Marcos Alberto Rojo known simply as Marcos Rojo ([makos roxo]; born 20 March 1990) is an Argentine professional footballer who plays for Manchester United and the Argentina national team as a defender.
He began his career at local club Estudiantes de La Plata, where he won the Copa Libertadores in 2009 and played in the Club World Cup Final later that year. After a short spell with Spartak Moscow he joined Sporting CP in 2012, and transferred to Manchester United for 16 million two years later.
Rojo made his first appearance for Argentina at senior level in 2011 and has since earned over 35 caps. He was part of their side which reached the 2014 FIFA World Cup Final, and was the only Argentine included in the Castrol Performance Index Team of the Tournament.


== Club career ==


=== Estudiantes LP ===
Rojo grew up in La Plata, Argentina and joined his local side Estudiantes de La Plata at the age of ten.
In 2009, he was promoted to the clubs main team, after signing his first professional contract. He spent three years with the club, making 43 appearances and scoring three goals for the team. He played in the 2009 FIFA Club World Cup Final, coming on for extra time as Estudiantes lost 21 to FC Barcelona in Dubai.
During his time at Estudiantes, Rojo won a Copa Libertadores and an Argentine Primera Division title. The defender spent most matches at left back and developed a reputation as a capable attacker, scoring his first goal in a 21 defeat against LDU Quito in the 2010 Recopa Sudamericana.


=== Spartak Moscow ===

In December 2010, Rojo signed a five-year contract with Spartak Moscow. He scored his only goal for Spartak on 20 April 2011, netting the opening goal of a 21 defeat of Krasnodar in the quarter-finals of the Russian Cup.


=== Sporting Lisbon ===
In July 2012, Rojo moved from Spartak Moscow to Sporting Lisbon for 3.5 million, signing a four-year contract. Rojo made his league debut for Sporting on 19 August 2012, playing the entire match and receiving a yellow card in a 00 draw with Vitria. He received his first red card for Sporting in a league match against FC Porto on 7 October 2012, picking up two cautions within three minutes, as Sporting fell to a 20 defeat. He scored his first goal for Sporting on 28 April 2013, netting the winner against Nacional. Rojo played mostly at centre-back in his first season in Portugal, occasionally at left-back, as the team had a comparatively bad season, finishing 7th in the league.
In the second league match of the 201314 season, Rojo scored his first goal of the season, netting Sporting's second goal in their 40 win over Acadmica. On 19 April 2014, Rojo was sent off in a Primeira Liga match against C.F. Os Belenenses, but Sporting held on for a 10 win. In an improved season, he contributed six goals as Sporting finished as runners-up.
On 13 August 2014, it was announced that Rojo was being disciplined by his club over his refusal to train after handing in a transfer request to force through a move to Manchester United. Sporting president Bruno de Carvalho later alleged that third-party owners of Rojo who were not representatives of Manchester United had pressured his club into selling the player.


=== Manchester United ===
On 19 August 2014, an agreement to sell Rojo for 20 million (16 million) was announced by both Sporting and Manchester United. The next day, United announced that they had signed him on a five-year contract, with Nani moving to Sporting on a season-long loan. Rojo stated that it was a 'dream' come true to play with Manchester United.
Rojo missed three matches for United due to difficulties in gaining a work permit, because of pending criminal charges in Argentina, where he is alleged to have had an altercation with a neighbour in 2010. On 4 September, he was granted a work permit by the Border Agency to work in England. Ten days later he made his debut at Old Trafford as United won for the first time in the season, playing the entirety of the 40 victory over Queens Park Rangers. Rojo was stretchered off in United's 10 defeat in the Manchester derby on 2 November, obtaining shoulder damage from a tackle on Manchester City's Martn Demichelis. It was later confirmed that he had dislocated his shoulder, adding to United's defensive injuries alongside Jonny Evans and Phil Jones.
On 3 February 2015, Rojo scored his first goal for United, heading a ball played by Robin van Persie for the second goal of a 30 win over Cambridge United in an FA Cup fourth round replay.


== International career ==

Rojo was first capped on 9 February 2011 in a 21 friendly victory against Portugal at the Stade de Suisse in Geneva, Switzerland. Later that year he was included in Argentina's squad as they hosted the 2011 Copa Amrica, and played the opening match on 2 July, a 11 draw against Bolivia. Javier Zanetti replaced him at left back for the rest of the tournament as Argentina reached the quarter-finals.
In June 2014, Rojo was named in Argentina's squad for the 2014 FIFA World Cup. He made his FIFA World Cup debut in their 21 victory over Bosnia and Herzegovina at the Maracan, playing the full match in defence. In the team's third group match, Rojo scored his first international goal, the winner in a 32 victory against Nigeria. The country reached the final before losing to Germany, and Rojo was the only Argentinean named in the Castrol Index Top 11 for the tournament.
Rojo was selected by coach Gerardo Martino for the 2015 Copa Amrica. At the end of Argentina's goalless quarter-final against Colombia in Via del Mar, Rojo missed in the penalty shootout but his team advanced nonetheless. On 30 June, he opened the scoring in a 61 semi-final defeat of Paraguay which put Argentina into the final.


== Style of play ==
According to Four Four Two, Rojo was more comfortable at left-back rather than centre-back in his first season at Sporting, due to a number of positional errors and mistimed tackles; in his second season, his speed helped him in defence. They also attributed a good aerial threat to him, while noting that disciplinary problems remained.
In addition to his usual positions at centre-back and left-back, Rojo can play as a winger. On signing for Manchester United, it was theorised that he could feature as a wing-back in Louis van Gaal's preferred 3-5-2 formation.


== Career statistics ==


=== Club ===
As of 24 May 2015.


=== International ===
As of match played 1 July 2015.


== Honours ==


=== Club ===
Estudiantes de La Plata
Copa Libertadores: 2009
Argentine Primera Divisin: 2010 Apertura


=== Individual ===
FIFA World Cup All-Star Team: 2014


== Personal life ==
Rojo is married to Eugenia Lusardo, a lingerie model based in Lisbon. They have a daughter.
He has a number of tattoos, including the English words "Pride" and "Glory" on each thigh.
In December 2014, Rojo had an affair with a woman he had met at a club. He accused her of blackmail and took out an injunction to stop newspapers publishing his name in the story. The injunction on his name was lifted in April 2015 due to concerns that other footballers could be suspected of the affair, but it remains in place to prevent the release of images of Rojo.


== References ==


== External links ==
Argentine Primera statistics at Ftbol XXI (Spanish)
Marcos Rojo at footballzz.co.uk
Marcos Rojo  FIFA competition recordJonathan Grant "Jonny" Evans (born 3 January 1988) is a Northern Irish professional footballer who plays as a defender for English club Manchester United and the Northern Ireland national team. Evans was born in Belfast and started his career at Greenisland FC, where he was spotted by Manchester United scouts. He progressed through Manchester United's football Academy to play in several foreign tours in the summer of 2006. He then went on loan to Royal Antwerp and had two spells with Sunderland. He made his Manchester United first team debut in the 200708 League Cup, becoming a regular first-team squad member the following season.


== Club career ==
Evans was scouted while playing for Greenisland FC, the same club that his brother Corry and Craig Cathcart played for before moving to Manchester United. At the age of nine, he was invited to attend the Manchester United Centre of Excellence in Belfast, before being invited for a trial in Manchester a year later. Rule changes within The Football Association at the time meant that clubs were limited to players who lived within an hour and a half of the club, so Evans' opportunities were limited. However, the Evans family soon relocated to Manchester, allowing Jonny to train with Manchester United full-time. Evans progressed through Manchester United's Academy, featuring in two of the club's three games during the 2006 summer tour of South Africa, as well as domestic friendlies against Celtic and Preston North End. Evans also made a surprise appearance in the Amsterdam Tournament against Ajax. Evans spent the first half of the 200607 season on loan at Manchester United's Belgian feeder club Royal Antwerp, alongside fellow youngsters Darron Gibson, Danny Simpson and Fraizer Campbell.


=== Sunderland loans ===
In December 2006, Evans agreed to join Sunderland on loan until the end of the 200607 season, with Manchester United and Antwerp team-mate Danny Simpson joining on a similar deal in the January transfer window. The pair helped Sunderland clinch the Football League Championship title, with Evans winning the club's "Youth Player of the Year" award at the end of the season. Although manager Roy Keane was hopeful of re-signing Evans on loan following promotion to the Premier League, it was confirmed in June 2007 that Evans would be staying at Manchester United to push for a place in the first team.
On 4 January 2008, Evans rejoined Sunderland on loan for the second time, and was immediately drafted into the first team squad. Evans played the 90 minutes in his first game, losing 30 to Wigan Athletic in the FA Cup. Evans was criticised for granting Wigan the second goal of the game, for which he lost the ball on the edge of his own box, resulting in a deflected own goal by Paul McShane. His half-season with Sunderland was generally successful, however, and the team avoided relegation.


=== Manchester United ===
Evans made his Manchester United debut on 26 September 2007 against Coventry City in the Football League Cup. Unfortunately, his debut ended in a 20 defeat. He then appeared as a late substitute for Gerard Piqu in a UEFA Champions League match at home to Dynamo Kyiv on 7 November 2007 to secure Manchester United's qualification to the knockout stage of the competition. He subsequently made his first Champions League start on 12 December 2007 against Roma.
Evans made his league debut for United against Chelsea on 21 September 2008, filling in for Nemanja Vidi who was unavailable due to suspension. The game ended 11. In December 2008, Evans made two substitute appearances for Manchester United at the FIFA Club World Cup, including one in the final after Nemanja Vidi was sent off shortly after half time. Evans continued to deputise throughout the rest of the season, appearing in a number of league games and in the League Cup final.
At the beginning of the 201011 football season, Evans became a regular fixture in the United team, partnering Nemanja Vidi in the centre of defence in the absence of the injured Rio Ferdinand. On 19 March 2011, Evans injured Bolton Wanderers and United States international Stuart Holden with a tackle which left Holden out for six months which eventually got worse and caused him to be slidelined for 22 months. Evans was given a straight red card however, Manchester United went on to win the game 10 with a Dimitar Berbatov goal.


==== 201112 season ====
Before the start of the 201112 season, Evans was handed the No. 6 shirt after Wes Brown was transferred to Sunderland. On 14 August, he wore his new shirt number for the first time in United's opening day 21 win at West Bromwich Albion, he came on for the injured Nemanja Vidi in the 52nd minute at The Hawthorns. On 23 October, he was sent off in United's 61 defeat against Manchester City after bringing down Mario Balotelli in a last-man challenge. Evans made his 100th appearance for the Red Devils on 30 November, he played the full 120 minutes as United lost 21 to Championship side Crystal Palace in the League Cup quarter final. On 18 March 2012, he scored his first goal for United after opening the scoring in the 50 league win at Wolverhampton Wanderers. Evans missed the final 3 games of the season with a foot injury.


==== 201213 season ====
Having undergone surgery to repair an ankle injury at the end of last season, Evans was unable to start pre-season training until early August, but there was speculation that he might be playing Manchester United's second game against Fulham. Evans scored his second goal for the club in a 30 away win at Newcastle United on 7 October 2012, thumping home a header from a Robin van Persie corner kick. On 23 October, Evans scored his first goal in the UEFA Champions League and first at Old Trafford in a 32 victory over Braga. He scored the equalising goal at 22, scrambling home from a corner kick. Evans netted his third goal of the season on 24 November 2012 in a 31 win, heading in the equaliser against Queens Park Rangers at Old Trafford from a corner. On 21 December 2012, Evans signed a new contract with United which will keep him at the club until June 2016. Evans scored his third league goal of the season and fourth overall on Boxing Day against Newcastle United, tapping home after Javier Hernandez's shot had been saved by Tim Krul.


==== 201415 season ====
On 7 March 2015, Evans received a six-match ban following a spitting altercation with Newcastle United striker Papiss Cisse.


== International career ==
Despite having not yet made his senior debut for Manchester United, Evans was called up to the Northern Ireland squad for the first time in September 2006, making his debut in the memorable 32 victory over Spain. Evans has since retained his place in the squad.


== Personal life ==
Evans' younger brother, Corry, is a footballer who plays as midfielder for Blackburn Rovers.
Evans attended Belfast High School in Newtownabbey, Northern Ireland, before moving to Ashton-on-Mersey High School in Manchester once he had been signed by Manchester United. He holds nine GCSEs, all A* or A grades.
On 19 December 2007, Evans was arrested in connection to an alleged rape that occurred at the hotel where Manchester United's Christmas party was held. On 8 March 2008, it was reported that Evans would not be prosecuted for any offence.
On 1 June 2013, Evans married Helen McConnell, a MUTV reporter, at Clough Presbyterian Church.This couple have a daughter named Lottie, born on 15 May 2014.


== Career statistics ==
Statistics accurate as of match played on 9 May 2015.


=== Club ===


=== International ===
Statistics accurate as of match played 6 October 2012.


== Honours ==


=== Club ===
Sunderland
Football League Championship (1): 200607
Manchester United
Premier League (3): 200809, 201011, 201213
Football League Cup (2): 200809, 200910
FA Community Shield (3): 2010, 2011, 2013
FIFA Club World Cup (1): 2008


== Notes ==
^ Includes other competitive competitions, including the FA Community Shield, UEFA Super Cup, FIFA Club World Cup


== References ==


== External links ==
Profile at ManUtd.com
Profile at StretfordEnd.co.uk
Profile at redStat
Profile at irishfa.com
Jonny Evans career statistics at SoccerbaseMemphis Depay (Dutch pronunciation: [mmfs dpi]; born 13 February 1994), also known simply as Memphis, is a Dutch footballer who plays as a winger for English club Manchester United and the Netherlands national team.
He began his professional career with PSV Eindhoven, scoring 50 goals in 124 games across all competitions. As the top scorer with 22 goals in 30 games, he helped the team win the 201415 Eredivisie title. He joined Manchester United in May 2015 for a reported 25 million fee.
Depay was part of the Dutch under-17 team which won the 2011 European Championship. He made his senior debut in 2013, and the following year was part of their squad which came third at the 2014 FIFA World Cup.


== Club career ==


=== PSV Eindhoven ===
Born in Moordrecht, Depay left his hometown club for Sparta Rotterdam aged nine, then moved to PSV Eindhoven three years later.


==== 201113: Beginnings ====
In 2011, Depay was on trial for PSV's first team while playing for Jong PSV  the club's reserve team. He made his official debut on 21 September 2011 in a KNVB Cup second round match against amateur side VVSB, opening an 80 away win. His first Eredivisie match was 26 February 2012, when PSV beat rivals Feyenoord 32 at the Philips Stadion, coming on in added time for Zakaria Labyad. On 18 March, six minutes after replacing Dries Mertens, he scored his first league goal to confirm a 51 win over sc Heerenveen. He made a total of eight league appearances in his first season, all as a substitute, scoring three goals.
Depay featured in the 2012 KNVB Cup Final on 8 April, playing the final four minutes of the 30 win over Heracles Almelo in place of Mertens at De Kuip in Rotterdam under interim coach Phillip Cocu, and was officially deployed in the first team the following day. On 29 June 2012, Depay signed his first professional contract with PSV, tying himself to the Boeren until 2017.
On 5 August, Depay featured in the 2012 Johan Cruijff Schaal at the Amsterdam ArenA, replacing Luciano Narsingh for the final six minutes as PSV defeated league champions Ajax 42. He made 20 Eredivisie appearances in his second season, scoring twice, including two starts. The first of these was on 2 March 2013 in a 20 home win over VVV-Venlo, scoring after three minutes after being set up by fellow teenager Jrgen Locadia. PSV again reached the cup final, losing 12 to AZ Alkmaar on 9 May, with Depay playing five minutes in place of Mertens.


==== 201314: Breakthrough season ====
Depay scored his first goal in European football on 30 July 2013, when he drifted in from the left and then smashed the ball into the top corner past goalkeeper Sammy Bossut as PSV defeated Zulte Waregem 20 in the first leg of their Champions League third qualifying round tie. PSV failed to qualify for the group stage of the Champions League, but in their second group stage match in the Europa League, Depay scored again, this time curling the ball into the net from outside the area, as the Dutch side defeated Chornomorets Odesa 20 on 3 October.
Depay provided the assist for Tim Matav's goal against Roda JC on 27 October 2013, but picked up two second-half yellow cards and was sent off for the first time in his professional career as PSV slumped to a 21 defeat. On 15 December, Depay helped PSV to just their second win in 13 matches, scoring twice in a 51 win over Utrecht. Depay helped PSV rack up their eighth win a row on 23 March 2014, a 31 win over Roda JC, having a hand in Bryan Ruiz's game-winning goal despite wearing a protective mask to cover a bruised eye socket suffered in a challenge with Renato Ibarra of Vitesse on 15 March.
He helped PSV secure a place in European competition for the 41st consecutive year, edging the ball past goalkeeper Jelle ten Rouwelaar to score their first in a 20 win over NAC Breda; the final day win ensured that the club would finish fourth in the Eredivisie table.


==== 201415: Top scorer and league title ====
After a successful showing in the 2014 World Cup, Depay was linked to a number of clubs, including Manchester United and Tottenham Hotspur. Amid the speculation surrounding his future, he started the season for PSV in impressive fashion. Depay came off the bench to score one goal and deliver one assist in the return game of the Europa League third qualifying round tie between PSV and SKN St. Plten on 7 August, as his team progressed to the play-off round after a 32 away win, giving them a 42 aggregate win over the Austrians. In the opening game of the Eredivisie season three days later, Depay played a major part in PSV's 31 away win against promoted side Willem II by scoring two goals. He improved on this performance in the following game, scoring two free kicks and delivering the assist for Georginio Wijnaldum's goal in a convincing 61 home win against NAC Breda. On 28 August, in the Europa League play-off second leg away in Belarus, he scored two late goals against Shakhtyor Soligorsk as PSV won 30 on aggregate to reach the group stage. Depay then suffered a groin injury during PSV's 31 defeat at PEC Zwolle on 13 September and he was substituted in the 18th minute.

On 18 April 2015, Depay scored the second goal with a free kick in a 41 home win over Heerenveen to give PSV their 22nd Eredivisie title, and first since 2008. Later that month, the club confirmed that they had received interest from others wishing to sign him, including Manchester United. He scored his last home goal for PSV in a 20 win against Heracles on 10 May. As he was substituted off, the stadium was filled with a defeaning cheer from the crowd around him and he was met with numerous congratulations from his teammates. He finished the season as the league's top scorer with 22 goals, two ahead of the runner-up, his team-mate Luuk de Jong.


=== Manchester United ===
On 7 May 2015, PSV confirmed that they had agreed a deal with Manchester United over Depay' transfer, subject to a medical. United manager Louis van Gaal said that he was "forced" into signing him early, due to interest from Paris Saint-Germain. Despite insistence from Liverpool manager Brendan Rodgers that he had never been after Depay, PSV director Marcel Brands had stated that he had conversations with Liverpool over a possible signing. United confirmed the signing of Depay on 12 June, on a four-year contract with the option to extend for a further year. He was unveiled as a Manchester United player at a press conference on 10 July 2015.
He made his Manchester United debut in a pre-season friendly against Club Amrica in Seattle on 17 July, contesting the first half as United fielded a different 11 players for each 45 minutes. He scored his first goal for the club four days later during a 31 win over San Jose Earthquakes.
At his own request, Depay was given the iconic number 7 shirt, previously worn by club legends such as George Best, Bryan Robson, David Beckham, and Cristiano Ronaldo.


== International career ==


=== Youth ===
Depay was a member of the Dutch under-17 team which won the 2011 European Championship in Serbia. In the final against Germany in Novi Sad, he scored the goal which put the Netherlands ahead as they came from behind to defeat their rivals 52.


=== Senior ===

Depay made his international debut on 15 October 2013, coming on for Jeremain Lens in the last minute of a 20 away win against Turkey at the kr Saracolu Stadium in World Cup qualification.
He was selected by Netherlands manager Louis van Gaal in the final 23-man squad for the 2014 FIFA World Cup in Brazil. He came on as a substitute before the half-time whistle in the second group match against Australia to replace defender Bruno Martins Indi, who had sustained a head injury, and in the 68th minute he scored the winning goal, a swerving effort from outside the box. He also set up Robin van Persie's equaliser. He became the youngest Dutchman to score a goal at the World Cup, at the age of 20 years and four months. He came on as a substitute again in the final group match against Chile on 23 June in So Paulo and scored the second goal for the Dutch, tapping in an Arjen Robben cross, as they clinched first place with a 20 victory.
On 11 July, Depay was named on the three-man shortlist for the tournament's Best Young Player award, together with Frenchmen Paul Pogba and Raphal Varane, but lost out to Pogba.
Depay's first goal since the World Cup came in a friendly at the Amsterdam Arena on 5 June 2015, deflecting Klaas-Jan Huntelaar's shot to put the Netherlands 31 up against the United States, although the team eventually lost 43.


== Style of play ==
Early in his career, a PSV coach noted Depay as "very angry", and he now uses a life coach to aid his mentality. In April 2015, The Daily Telegraph described Depay as "a fearsome striker of the ball with his right-foot but is usually used an as inverted left winger who cuts onto his right foot. A pacey and tricky player, his direct running makes him a difficult opponent for defenders". However, they criticised him as "a ball-hog", pointing out his high rate of shots in comparison to a low rate of assists.
Former Dutch international and Southampton manager Ronald Koeman regards Depay as "a great talent", but says that he must continue his personal development due to the physicality and mental strength needed in the Premier League.


== Personal life ==
Depay is the son of a Ghanaian father and a Dutch mother. His parents split up when he was aged four. He plays only under his given name to spite his absent father. Depay has numerous tattoos, including one that is a tribute to his grandfather, who died on the day before he turned 15.


== Career statistics ==


=== Club ===
As of 20 June 2015
Notes


=== International ===
Statistics accurate as of matches played on 12 June 2015.


== Honours ==


=== Club ===
PSV Eindhoven
Eredivisie: 201415
KNVB Cup: 201112
Johan Cruijff Shield: 2012


=== International ===
Netherlands
UEFA U-17 Championship: 2011
FIFA World Cup third place: 2014


=== Individual ===
Eredivisie top scorer: 201415
Johan Cruyff Trophy: 201415


== References ==


== External links ==
Voetbal International profile (Dutch)
Netherlands U17 stats at OnsOranje
Netherlands U19 stats at OnsOranjeJuan Manuel Mata Garca, commonly known as Juan Mata (Spanish pronunciation: [xwam mata]; born 28 April 1988), is a Spanish footballer who plays as a midfielder for English club Manchester United and the Spain national team. He mostly plays as a central attacking midfielder, but he can also play on the wing.
A graduate of Real Madrid's youth academy, Mata played for Real Madrid Castilla in 200607, before joining Valencia in 200708. He became an integral part of the club's midfield, making 174 appearances over the course of four seasons. In August 2011, Mata signed for English Premier League club Chelsea for a fee believed to be in the region of 28 million, and in his debut season was part of the team that won the UEFA Champions League and the FA Cup. The following year, Chelsea won the UEFA Europa League, making Mata and team-mate Fernando Torres the first players to hold the Champions League, Europa League, World Cup, and the European Championships simultaneously. After falling out of favour at Chelsea under Jos Mourinho, Mata was sold to Manchester United in January 2014 for a fee of 37.1 million.
Mata is a Spanish international, having represented Spain at under-16, under-17, under-19, under-20, under-21, Olympic, and senior levels. He played for the under-20 side in the 2007 FIFA U-20 World Cup. In June 2009, Mata was included for the 2009 FIFA Confederations Cup, his first senior tournament. On 9 September 2009, Mata scored his first goal for the senior team, against Estonia, securing the nation a place in the 2010 World Cup in South Africa, and was part of Spain's 2010 FIFA World Cup-winning squad. In 2011, he went back to playing in the under-21 side, helping Spain win the 2011 UEFA European Under-21 Football Championship in Denmark. He won the Golden Player award and was part of the Team of the Tournament.


== Early life ==
Mata was born in the town of Ocn de Villafranca, Burgos. He inherited his name from his father, Juan Manuel Mata Rodrguez, who was also a footballer. He was a forward who played in the 1980s and early 1990s for nearby Burgos CF. Mata was raised in his father's home town of Oviedo, Asturias. His father later acted as Mata's agent, becoming FIFA-registered in the process. In his spare time, Mata enjoys table-tennis, a sport he played as a child. Upon his move to Chelsea, he said he also enjoys sightseeing around London. He gained a nickname at Chelsea  "Johnny Kills," the literal translation of his name from Spanish into English. His name translates as "forest" or "dweller by the forest."


== Club career ==


=== Early career ===
Mata started his football career at Real Oviedo, where his father spent most of his career. He stayed there for three years before joining Real Madrid's youth academy, La Fabrica, at age 15. After appearing for their Cadete A team, he swiftly progressed through the junior teams, Juvenil C and finally the Juvenil A. In his last campaign (200506), he scored two goals in the league and three more in the Copa de Campeones, including the winner in the final against Real Valladolid, adding another three in the Spanish Juvenil Cup.
Switching to Real Madrid Castilla in 200607, Mata was given the number 34 shirt in the first team, while wearing number 28 in Castilla. In spite of Castilla's final Segunda Divisin relegation, he finished the season as the side's second best scorer at ten, behind striker lvaro Negredo, who registered 18.


=== Valencia ===

Mata had a release clause at Real Madrid during his last season at the club, and eventually agreed to sign for fellow La Liga side Valencia CF in March 2007, starting in 200708.
Benefitting from constant injuries to Vicente and the ostracism to which then-manager Ronald Koeman condemned Miguel ngel Angulo, Mata gradually carved a niche in Valencia's first eleven. On 20 March 2008, he scored twice in the Copa del Rey semifinal match against FC Barcelona to help Valencia reach the final against Getafe CF where, on 16 April, he netted the opener in a 31 win. During that first season, he was voted the team's Best Young Player by fans and players alike.
In the 2008 Spanish SuperCup, Mata scored against his former club Real Madrid in a 12 first leg loss, but Valencia lost 36 on aggregate after a 24 away loss in the second game. He started 200809 well, scoring in the opener against RCD Mallorca in a 30 win. He also netted the only goal of the game against CA Osasuna, latching on to a long ball from David Villa.
On 25 September 2008, Mata proved to be growing in efficiency, as he set up two of his teammate's goals in a 20 away win over Mlaga CF. Three days later, he put in a superb performance against Deportivo de La Corua, scoring one and creating the other three, in a 42 home victory.
Towards the end of the campaign, Mata managed to score two very important late goals for Valencia: the first, the 32 winner at Sporting de Gijn, and the second a penalty against Sevilla FC at home, to put Valencia 21 up (specialist Villa had already been replaced due to injury) in an eventual 31 success. He achieved impressive stats during the season, finishing with 11 successful strikes and 13 assists, behind just Barcelona's Xavi as the league's best.
In the following two seasons, Mata was an everpresent offensive figure for Valencia, scoring 17 goals in 68 games combined, with the club achieving back-to-back third-league places. On 10 April 2011, he netted two in a 50 home win against Valencian neighbours Villarreal CF. On 9 May, England-based Spanish journalist Guillem Balagu reported interest from several Premier League clubs.


=== Chelsea ===
On 21 August 2011, Valencia announced they had agreed a 23.5 million fee for the transfer of Mata to Premier League club Chelsea, subject to a medical. On 24 August 2011, Mata signed a five-year deal with Chelsea. He revealed that compatriot Fernando Torres helped persuade him to move to Stamford Bridge, saying "Fernando got me excited about the thought of coming here. He said it would be good for me here, and that me and him together could be good. I also talked to my family and friends about it as well."
On 26 August 2011, Yossi Benayoun offered Mata his number 10 shirt. The Israeli captain said, "I decided to give Mata the number 10  his favourite. For me, it's just a number, not my lucky 15." (Florent Malouda wore number 15 for Chelsea at the time.) Mata wore number 10 for Valencia and for Spain's under-21s in the summer, and expressed his gratitude to Benayoun. "It is a very important number to me so I'm pleased to be wearing it. I want to thank Yossi," he said. Mata follows on from Chelsea players Joe Cole, Mark Hughes, Ian Hutchinson, and Terry Venables in adopting the number 10 shirt.


==== 201112 season ====

Mata made his debut for Chelsea against Norwich City on 27 August 2011, where he came on as a 68th-minute substitute for Florent Malouda and scored the club's third goal in the 11th minute of stoppage time. Chelsea went on to win the match 31. He started his first game for his new club in their next fixture on 10 September away to Sunderland, helping Chelsea secure a 12 win. On 14 September, Mata made his UEFA Champions League debut for Chelsea and netted in stoppage time to help his side defeat Bayer Leverkusen 20.
On 29 October 2011, Mata assisted Chelsea's 6,000th league goal with an in-swinging cross which was headed in by Frank Lampard. In the same game, Mata scored with a spectacular 25-yard strike in a 35 home defeat to London rivals Arsenal. On 26 November, Mata set up the first two goals which were scored by John Terry and Daniel Sturridge and also scored the third goal himself in a 30 win against Wolverhampton Wanderers. He was awarded the Man of the Match in a 03 away win at St James' Park for his performance against Newcastle United.
On 6 December 2011, during Chelsea's decisive Champions League match against former club Valencia CF, Mata created two assists for both of Didier Drogba goals. The game ended in a 30 win, which resulted in Chelsea qualifying first from their group. On Boxing Day, Mata scored his side's only goal in a 11 draw at Stamford Bridge against Fulham. Mata scored Chelsea's first goal of their FA Cup campaign in a 40 win over Portsmouth at Stamford Bridge.
In an FA Cup Fourth round tie with Queens Park Rangers at Loftus Road, Mata scored his side's only goal from the penalty spot in a 01 victory. On 5 February 2012, Mata scored an unstoppable volley against Manchester United after a beautiful cross from Spanish teammate Fernando Torres. The game finished 33. On 21 February, Mata scored his side's only goal in their 13 defeat away at Napoli in the first leg of the Champions League round of 16.
After the appointment of Roberto Di Matteo as interim first-team coach, Mata was played as a central attacking midfielder rather than being played on the left wing. Mata scored and had a penalty saved by Colin Doyle in the FA Cup 5th round replay against Birmingham City at St Andrew's, which Chelsea won 02, helping them into the quarter-finals of the FA Cup. He continued his trait of scoring in each round; this run, however, ended against Leicester City in the quarter-final, which Chelsea nonetheless won 52. On 7 April, Mata scored his 11th goal of the season against Wigan Athletic; it was a vital goal that gave the Blues a 21 victory over the Latics and kept alive Chelsea's fight for a Champions League spot.
On 15 April, in Chelsea's 51 win against Tottenham Hotspur in the FA Cup semi-final at Wembley Stadium, Mata scored a controversial goal and assisted Ramires and Florent Malouda for their goals, adding to his statistics in the 201112 FA Cup with four goals and three assists. Mata started in both legs of Chelsea's Champions League semi-final clash with reigning champions FC Barcelona, helping his side to an unexpected 32 win on aggregate. and set up a final clash with Bayern Munich on 19 May.
Mata provided two assists to fellow Spaniard Fernando Torres in the 61 thrashing of West London rivals Queens Park Rangers on 29 April, bringing his tally to 13 Premier League assists on the season. Mata assisted the first goal in the FA Cup final, which Ramires scored, as Chelsea beat Liverpool 21 at Wembley, with Mata picking up Man of the Match award. On 10 May, Mata was rewarded for his consistent form throughout his first Chelsea season by the fans voting him the club's Player of the Year, following on from Chelsea legends such as Dennis Wise and Gianfranco Zola, whom he had been compared to on various occasions.
In the 2012 UEFA Champions League Final against Bayern Munich on 19 May, Mata assisted Didier Drogba's headed equalizer from a corner kick in the 88th minute. The match went on to extra-time and penalties, with Mata taking Chelsea's first, which Bayern goalkeeper Manuel Neuer saved. Chelsea, however, went on to win 43 in the penalty-shootout, lifting their first Champions League title. Mata finished his first season at Stamford Bridge with 573 passes, creating 66 chances and completing 61 successful crosses, which all contributed to Chelsea's cup-double winning season. He finished the Premier League season with 14 assists  second highest in the league after Manchester City's David Silva  and six goals. 


==== 201213 season ====
Juan Mata missed all of Chelsea's pre-season games as he was playing for Spain at the 2012 Summer Olympics in London, but he returned to play in the 2012 FA Community Shield against Manchester City and was substituted after 74 minutes for Daniel Sturridge. Mata assisted his first goal of the season on 22 September 2012 against Stoke City, providing a great flick to Ashley Cole, which turned out to be the winning goal as Chelsea won 10. He scored his first goal of the season in the 201213 Football League Cup third round against Wolverhampton Wanderers, with the game finishing 60 to Chelsea. Four days later, he scored his first Premier League goal of the season, assisting Fernando Torres for the opener and then scoring directly from a free-kick in a 21 away win against Arsenal at the Emirates Stadium.

Mata scored Chelsea's first and third goal in the Champions League as Chelsea beat Nordsjlland 04 away in Farum, Denmark. He later provided two assists in Chelsea's 41 rout of Norwich City, sending Eden Hazard through on goal and later flicking a delightful ball for defender Branislav Ivanovi to volley in. In a London Derby game against Tottenham Hotspur at White Hart Lane on 20 October, Mata scored twice and provided an assist for Daniel Sturridge in a 24 victory for Chelsea, where he also earned Man of the Match honours. He next scored in a Premier League match with a beautiful free kick against Manchester United. Chelsea, however, lost the match 32 after a late controversial goal from Javier Hernndez. Mata went on to win the Premier League Player of the Month award for October after scoring three league goals.
After manager Roberto Di Matteo was sacked following a 30 defeat to Juventus in the Champions League, Mata scored the first goal of new, interim manager Rafael Bentez's reign at Chelsea against West Ham United, although Chelsea suffered a 31 defeat in this game. He scored again in Chelsea's win over Nordsjlland in a Champions League game, but Chelsea still failed to advance to the knockouts despite a 61 win at home. He added to his tally of goals and his collection of fine performance at Sunderland in a 13 Chelsea win. After this game, Chelsea traveled to Japan for the 2012 FIFA Club World Cup. Here, too, Mata continued his top form by scoring Chelsea's first goal in the tournament against Monterrey in the semi-final, helping them on their course to the final with a 13 victory. The tournament, however, ended in disappointment as Chelsea were beaten 10 by Brazilian club Corinthians in the final. The team put the defeat behind them by completing an 80 routing of Aston Villa, a game in which though Mata did not score a goal, but nevertheless played a very influential part.
On 22 December 2012, Mata signed a contract extension with Chelsea which tied him up with the club until 2018. On Boxing Day, Chelsea traveled to Carrow Road to face Norwich City, where both Manchester United and Arsenal had suffered defeats earlier in the season. Mata scored a brilliant goal in the 38th minute, taking a pass from Oscar into his stride and launching an unstoppable shot into the goal from 25 yards out. The goal turned out to be the winner. Then, on 5 January, Mata provided assists for new acquisition Demba Ba and Branislav Ivanovi to help Chelsea win 15 against Southampton in the 3rd round of the 201213 FA Cup. A week later, he forced an own goal from Jonathan Walters by putting in a tight corner and earned a penalty which Frank Lampard converted. Chelsea went on to win the game 04, which was Stoke's first home defeat of the season. Mata scored his eighth goal of the season in the Premier League against Arsenal in a 21 home win.
On 3 March 2013, Mata made his 100th appearance in all competitions for Chelsea in a 10 win over West Bromwich Albion at Stamford Bridge. On 14 March, Mata scored an opening goal in Chelsea's Europa League 31 (32) win against Steaua Bucureti. On 19 April, Mata was nominated for PFA Players' Player of the Year in recognition of his contribution to Chelsea's season in all competitions. The PFA's decision was based on his "ability to not only create goals but also score them himself" and saw him nominated alongside teammate Eden Hazard. He also netted an 87th-minute winner against Manchester United, a crucial one for Chelsea's Champions League qualification hopes.
On 15 May, Mata gave a fine performance in the 2013 UEFA Europa League Final against Portugal's Benfica, assisting Branislav Ivanovi's injury time winner from a corner kick. The next day, he was awarded Chelsea's Player's Player of the Year award. He modestly gave the credit to the whole of the squad, saying that, "he felt proud to play for Chelsea," and thanked his teammates. He was also awarded Chelsea's Player of the Year for the second successive season. On winning his second award of the night, he said, "I feel so happy. It's my second season here and winning the trophy two years in a row is amazing for me. I just want to say thank you to all the supporters and all my teammates."


==== 201314 season ====

Under new Chelsea manager Jos Mourinho, Mata spent a lot of time on the bench. Mourinho preferred Oscar as a playmaker, and suggested Mata needed to adapt to a wider position and to working harder defensively. On 28 September 2013, Mata came on as a half-time substitute against Tottenham Hotspur to assist John Terry to score an equaliser in a 11 draw, but his appearances in the first team remained infrequent. On 29 October, he scored his first goal of the season in a 20 League Cup victory at London rivals Arsenal.
Mata struggled to secure a regular first-team place under Mourinho as he had started just 11 of Chelsea's 22 Premier League matches, and overall made just 18 appearances for Chelsea. Mata scored 33 goals and provided 58 assists in 135 appearances over two-and-a-half seasons with Chelsea.


=== Manchester United ===


==== 201314 season ====
On 24 January 2014, Mourinho said Chelsea had accepted a transfer offer from Manchester United and he allowed Mata to travel to Manchester to undergo a medical, after the player said he was "really happy to go". Manchester United confirmed later in the day that a transfer fee had been agreed, but that the deal was still contingent on Mata agreeing personal terms and passing a medical. The transfer was completed the following day, with Manchester United paying Chelsea a then club record fee of 37.1 million, with Mata signing a contract until the summer of 2018.
He made his debut against Cardiff City on 28 January and provided one assist in the 20 home victory. Mata scored his first goal for United in a 41 win over Aston Villa on March 29, 2014. He also went on to score two goals against Newcastle United in a 40 away victory, two more against Norwich City after coming off the bench in another 40 win, and the only goal in a 11 draw against Southampton in the final match of the season.
Mata ended the season having scored six goals for Manchester United, all in the Premier League, since he was cup tied and unable to play in the Champions League and other cup competitions due to his participation in the tournaments with Chelsea earlier in the season.


==== 201415 season ====
Mata began the new season in fine form. He scored the only goal in Manchester United's second game of the Premier League season, a 11 draw against Sunderland at Old Trafford, following it up with a goal against Queens Park Rangers in a 40 thumping, which was also Louis van Gaal's first competitive win in charge of United. He was later dropped to the bench for the following two matches, making cameo appearances against Leicester City and West Ham United, with van Gaal preferring an attacking trinity of Wayne Rooney, Robin van Persie and new signing Radamel Falcao in both games.
Following Rooney's sending off and suspension due to a foul on Stewart Downing in the match against West Ham, Mata was reinstated to the starting lineup, and he started the next match against Everton, a 21 win at Old Trafford in which he provided the assist for ngel Di Mara's goal. Mata later scored winning goals in home games against Crystal Palace and Stoke City, the former after coming on as a second-half substitute. He made his return to the starting line-ups for the first time, in a 30 win over Tottenham but was substituted in the 77th minute for Andreas Pereira. On 22 March 2015, Mata scored a brace, including a bicycle kick, in a 21 victory over Liverpool, a performance which he rated as his best for Manchester United. His second goal against Liverpool was also voted as Premier League Goal of the Month in March 2015. His inspired performances led to him being named as Manchester United's Player of the Month for March.


== International career ==

Mata helped Spain win the 2006 UEFA European Under-19 Football Championship, where he was a key player. He finished the championship second to his teammate Alberto Bueno (five goals) as top goal scorer of the competition, with four in five matches.
On 1 February 2007, under-21 coach Iaki Sez included him on his squad for the friendly against England, alongside Real Madrid teammates Roberto Soldado, Jos Manuel Jurado, Sergio Snchez, Miguel Torres, Esteban Granero, and Antonio Adn, at just 18 years and 10 months.
On 14 November 2008, Vicente del Bosque called up Mata for the senior team to play in a friendly against Chile. He did not leave the bench in a 30 home win. On 28 March 2009, he finally made his debut, playing in the 2010 FIFA World Cup qualifier against Turkey, a 10 win in Madrid. He came on as a substitute for teammate David Villa in the 63rd minute.
In June 2009, Del Bosque included Mata for the 2009 FIFA Confederations Cup, the youngster's first senior tournament. He started in the second group match against Iraq and came on as a substitute for Albert Riera in the semi-final loss to the United States.
On 9 September 2009, Mata scored his first goal for the senior team, as the 30 win against Estonia secured a place in the World Cup in South Africa. He followed this up with the winner against Armenia on 10 October, scoring a penalty to steal a 21 win. Picked for the final stages, he appeared once for the eventual champions, replacing Fernando Torres for the final 20 minutes of the 20 group stage win against Honduras. In the following summer, he went back to the under-21 side, playing the role of senior squad member and helped Spain win the 2011 UEFA European Under-21 Football Championship in Denmark. Mata himself was included in UEFA's Team of the Tournament and named as the tournament's Golden Player.
Mata returned to the senior squad for UEFA Euro 2012 and, after coming on as a substitute, scored Spain's fourth goal in the final as Spain defeated Italy 40 to retain their title as champions of Europe.
Mata was included in Spain's squad for the 2012 Olympic football tournament as one of their three designated overage players. Spain, however, failed to score in any of their opening three matches and were eliminated at the Group Stage.


== Style of play ==
A skillful attacking midfielder, Mata is known for his passing and technique. At 5'7" he has a medium build that further facilitates agile mobility, Mata possesses great vision that allows him to provide assists to accompanying forwards.


== Career statistics ==


=== Club ===
As of 24 May 2015.
1Includes other competitive competitions, including the Supercopa de Espaa.
2Includes other competitive competitions, including the FA Community Shield, FIFA Club World Cup and UEFA Super Cup.


=== International ===
As of 23 June 2014.


== Honours ==


=== Club ===
Valencia
Copa del Rey (1): 200708
Chelsea
FA Cup (1): 201112
UEFA Champions League (1): 201112
UEFA Europa League (1): 201213


=== Country ===
Spain
FIFA World Cup: 2010
UEFA European Football Championship: 2012
FIFA Confederations Cup: Third-place 2009, Runner-up 2013
UEFA U-19 Championship: 2006
UEFA European Under-21 Football Championship: 2011


=== Individual ===
UEFA U-21 Championship Golden Player: 2011
UEFA U-21 Championship Bronze Boot: 2011
UEFA U-21 Championship Team of the Tournament: 2011
Chelsea Player of the Year (2): 201112, 201213
FA Cup Final Man of the Match: 2012
Premier League Player of the Month (1): October 2012
Premier League PFA Team of the Year (1): 201213


== References ==


== External links ==
Official website (Spanish)
Juan Mata  FIFA competition record
Juan Mata  UEFA competition record
Profile on the Premier League
BDFutbol profile
National team data
Soccerbase profile
Juan Mata profile at Soccerway
Biography at CiberChe (Spanish)Wayne Mark Rooney /runi/ (born 24 October 1985) is an English professional footballer who plays for and captains both Manchester United and the England national team. He has played much of his career as a forward, but he has also been used in various midfield roles.
Aged nine, Rooney joined the youth team of Everton, for whom he made his professional debut in 2002 at the age of 16. He spent two seasons at the Merseyside club, before moving to Manchester United for 25.6 million in the 2004 summer transfer window. Since then, with Rooney in the team, United have won the Premier League five times, the UEFA Champions League once, the FIFA Club World Cup once and the League Cup twice. In September 2013, Rooney scored his 200th goal for United. He is currently on 230 goals, making him the club's third-highest goalscorer of all time.
Rooney made his senior international debut in February 2003 aged 17, becoming the youngest player to represent England (a record since broken by Theo Walcott) and he is England's youngest ever goalscorer. He played at UEFA Euro 2004 and scored four goals, briefly becoming the youngest goalscorer in the history of the European Championship. Rooney has since featured at the 2006, 2010 and 2014 World Cups and is widely regarded as his country's best player. He has won the England Player of the Year award three times, in 2008, 2009 and 2014. As of 14 June 2015, he has won 105 international caps and scored 48 goals, making him England's joint-eighth most-capped player and joint second-highest goalscorer in history. Along with David Beckham, Rooney is the most red carded player for England, having been sent off twice.
In 200910, Rooney was awarded the PFA Players' Player of the Year and the FWA Footballer of the Year. He has won the Premier League Player of the Month award five times, a record he shares with Steven Gerrard. He came fifth in the vote for the 2011 FIFA Ballon d'Or and was named in the FIFPro World 11 for 2011. Rooney has won the 'Goal of the Season' award by the BBC's Match of the Day poll on three occasions, with his bicycle kick against rivals Manchester City winning the 'Premier League Goal of the 20 Seasons' award. A March 2012 report listed Rooney as the fifth highest-paid player in the world, with an annual income of $32.6 million.


== Early life and education ==
Rooney was born in Croxteth, Liverpool to Jeanette Marie (ne Morrey) and Thomas Wayne Rooney. He is of Irish descent and was brought up as a Roman Catholic with younger brothers Graham and John; all three attended Our Lady and St Swithin's primary school and De La Salle School. He grew up supporting Everton.


== Club career ==


=== Everton ===


==== Youth squads ====
Rooney began playing for Liverpool Schoolboys and scored 72 goals in one season, a record which stood until May 2010. At age nine, Rooney played for Copplehouse boys' club in the local Walton and Kirkdale junior league and scored 99 goals in his final season before being spotted by Everton scout Bob Pendleton. Rooney joined Everton at age nine, and was the Everton mascot for the Merseyside derby against Liverpool as an 11-year-old. In the 199596 season, he scored 114 goals in 29 games for Everton's under-10s and 11s, and by the age of 15, he was playing for the under-19s. He scored eight goals in eight games during Everton's run to the FA Youth Cup final in 2002. This included one goal in the final defeat against Aston Villa and, upon scoring, he revealed a T-shirt that read, "Once a Blue, always a Blue." Rooney was included in Everton's first team squad for their training camp in Austria in the summer of 2002 and scored his first senior goal in a 31 friendly victory over SC Weiz on 15 July.


==== First team breakthrough ====

Rooney was an unused substitute in Everton's 10 away win over Southampton on 20 April 2002. He made his senior debut on 17 August in a 22 home draw against Tottenham Hotspur, starting the match and assisting the first goal by Mark Pembridge. He became the second youngest first-team player in Everton history behind Joe Royle. In that match he was booed by the Spurs fans who shouted "Who are ya?" whenever he touched the ball. His first senior goals came on 2 October when he scored twice in a 30 away win over Wrexham in the second round of the League Cup. These goals meant that Rooney was Everton's youngest-ever goalscorer at the time.
On 19 October, five days before his 17th birthday, Rooney scored a last-minute winning goal against Arsenal. The goal ended Arsenal's 30-match unbeaten run, and also made Rooney the youngest goalscorer in Premier League history, a record that has since been surpassed twice, by James Milner and James Vaughan. He scored the only goal in a 10 away win over Leeds United 15 days later.
In December, Rooney was named 2002's BBC Young Sports Personality of the Year. Six days after claiming the award he scored the winning goal against Blackburn Rovers in a 21 home win. His first career red card came on Boxing Day in a 11 away draw against Birmingham City for a late challenge on Steve Vickers. In January 2003, Rooney signed his first professional contract, which made him one of world football's highest-paid teenagers. Rooney's first goal of 2003 came on 23 March, netting Everton's only goal in a 21 loss at Arsenal. In April, he scored a goal in Everton's 21 home win over Newcastle United, before hitting a last-minute winner against Aston Villa in another 21 home win. He ended his debut season with 8 goals in 37 appearances in all competitions for the Toffees.
Rooney scored his first goal of the 200304 season in a 22 away draw against Charlton Athletic on 26 August 2003. He did not find the net again until December when he scored in a 21 away win over Portsmouth, and a 32 home win over Leicester City. His final goal of 2003 came on his 50th league appearance, netting the only goal in a 10 home win over Birmingham City on 28 December. On 21 February 2004, Rooney scored two goals in a Premier League game for the first time in a 33 away draw against Southampton. He scored the sole goal in a 10 win over Portsmouth on 13 March, before scoring in a 11 away draw against Leicester City one week later. He scored his final goal of the season in a 11 away draw against Leeds United on 13 April.


=== Manchester United ===


==== 200405 season ====
Rooney made a transfer request in August 2004, despite Everton having made a new contract offer valued at 50,000 per week. Everton then rejected a bid of 20 million from Newcastle, and ultimately signed for Manchester United at the end of the month after a 25.6 million deal was reached. It was the highest fee ever paid for a player under 20 years old; Rooney was still only 18 when he left Everton. Sir Alex Ferguson, then manager of United, said that "There were plenty of eyebrows raised" when he persuaded the club's board of directors to sanction "a multi-million pound" move to try to sign Rooney from Everton.
Rooney was given the number 8 shirt upon his arrival at Old Trafford. He made his United debut on 28 September in a 62 home win over Fenerbahe in the Champions League, scoring a hat-trick and laying on an assist. These goals made Rooney the youngest player to score a hat-trick in the Champions League aged 18 years 335 days. However, his first season with Manchester United ended without winning a trophy as they could only manage a third-place finish in the league, and failed to progress to the last eight of the Champions League. United had more success in the cup competitions, but were edged out of the League Cup in the semi finals by a Chelsea side who also won the Premier League title that season, and a goalless draw with Arsenal in the FA Cup final was followed by a penalty shoot-out defeat. Rooney was United's top league scorer that season with 11 goals, and was credited with the PFA Young Player of the Year award.


==== 200507 ====

In September 2005, Rooney was sent off in a goalless Champions League match against Villarreal of Spain for sarcastically clapping the referee, who had booked him for an unintentional foul on an opponent. His first trophy with United came in the 2006 League Cup, and he was also named man of the match after scoring twice in the final as United won 40 against Wigan Athletic. His club finished the season as Premier League runners up, with their title hopes ended in late April when they lost 30 away to champions Chelsea. Rooney sustained a broken metatarsal in that game after a tackle from Paulo Ferreira. Rooney scored a total of 16 goals in 26 Premier League games in the 200506 season.
Rooney was sent off in an Amsterdam Tournament match against Porto on 4 August 2006 after hitting Porto defender Pepe with his elbow. He was punished with a three-match ban by the FA, following their receipt of a 23-page report from referee Ruud Bossen that explained his decision. Rooney threatened to withdraw the FA's permission to use his image if they did not revoke the ban, although the FA had no power to make such a decision.
During the first half of the 200607 season, Rooney endured a ten-game scoreless streak before scoring a hat-trick against Bolton Wanderers. He subsequently signed a two-year contract extension the following month that tied him to United until 2012. In April 2007, he scored two goals in an 83 aggregate Champions League quarter-final win over Roma and two more in the same competition later in the month, in a 32 semi-final first leg victory over Milan. Rooney collected his first Premier League title winner's medal at the end of the 200607 season. He scored 14 league goals that season.


==== 200709 ====

In June 2007, Rooney was given squad number 10, last worn by Ruud van Nistelrooy. Rooney reasoned that he always loved that number. He fractured his left metatarsal in United's opening-day goalless draw against Reading on 12 August, the same injury he had suffered to his right foot in 2004. After being sidelined for six weeks, he returned for United's 10 Champions League group stage win over Roma on 2 October, scoring the only goal of the match. Rooney was again injured on 9 November, hurting his ankle during a training session and missing an additional two weeks. His next match after injury was against Fulham on 3 December, in which he played 70 minutes. Rooney missed a total of ten games and finished the 200708 season with 18 goals (12 of them in the league), as United clinched the Premier League. In the Champions League's first-ever all-English final, United defeated league rivals Chelsea to win another trophy.

Rooney played in 2008 UEFA Super Cup where United lost to Zenit Saint Petersburg and was unable to make an impact. On 4 October 2008, in an away win over Blackburn Rovers, Rooney became the youngest player to make 200 Premier League appearances. On 14 January after scoring the only goal of the game 54 seconds into the 10 win over Wigan Athletic, Rooney limped off with a hamstring injury in the eighth minute. On 25 April 2009, Rooney scored his final league goals of the season against Tottenham; United scored five goals in the second half to come from 20 down to win 52; Rooney grabbed two goals, set up two and provided the assist that led to the penalty for United's first goal. On 27 May, Rooney played against Barcelona in the 2009 Champions League Final in Rome, with United losing 20. Rooney ended the season with 20 goals in all competitions. Once again, he managed 12 goals in the league.


==== 200910 season ====
Rooney scored in the 90th minute of the season-opening 2009 Community Shield, although United lost the game to Chelsea on penalties. He then scored the only goal of the first league game of the 200910 season against Birmingham City, taking his overall United tally to 99. On 22 August, he became the 20th Manchester United player to score 100 goals for the club, when he found the net twice in a 50 away win at Wigan Athletic.

On 29 August, United played Arsenal at Old Trafford. Rooney scored a goal from the penalty spot to level the game after Andrei Arshavin had put the Gunners ahead. The game finished 21 to Manchester United after Abou Diaby scored an own goal. On 28 November 2009, Rooney scored his first hat-trick for three years in a 41 away victory against Portsmouth, with two of the goals being penalties. On 27 December 2009, he was awarded Man of the Match against Hull City. He was involved in all the goals scored in the game, hitting the opener and then giving away the ball for Hull's equalising penalty. He then forced Andy Dawson into conceding an own goal and then set up Dimitar Berbatov for United's third goal which gave them a 31 victory. On 30 December 2009, Rooney scored another goal as United beat Wigan 50 in their final game of the decade.
On 23 January 2010, Rooney scored all four goals in Manchester United's 40 win over Hull City; three of the goals came in the last 10 minutes of the match. This was the first time in his career that he registered four goals in a single match. On 27 January 2010, he continued his scoring run by heading the winner in the second minute of stoppage time against derby rivals Manchester City. This gave United a 43 aggregate win, taking them into the final; it was his first League Cup goal since netting two in the 2006 final. On 31 January 2010, Rooney scored his 100th Premier League goal in a 31 win over Arsenal for the first time in the league at the Emirates, notably his first Premier League goal also came against Arsenal.
On 16 February 2010, Rooney hit his first European goals of the season, scoring two headers in the 32 away win against Milan in Manchester United's first ever win against them at the San Siro. On 28 February 2010, he scored another header against Aston Villa (his fifth consecutive headed goal) which resulted in Manchester United winning the League Cup final 21. In the second leg of United's European tie against Milan, Rooney scored a brace in a resounding 40 home victory, taking his tally of goals that season to 30. He then added two more to his tally five days later at Old Trafford, in a 30 league win over Fulham.
On 30 March 2010, during United's Champions League quarter-final first leg defeat against Bayern Munich at Munich's Allianz Arena, Rooney crumpled when he twisted his ankle in the last minute, hobbling off while Bayern were producing the buildup that led to their second goal. There were fears that he had received serious ligament damage or even a broken ankle, but it was announced that the injury was only slight ligament damage, and that he would be out for 2 to 3 weeks, missing United's crunch match with Chelsea and the return leg against Munich the following week. The team list for second leg yielded a massive surprise when Rooney was given a starting place in the United line-up. Despite a 30 lead by the 41st minute, Munich snatched a goal back and United were later forced down to 10 men after Rafael da Silva was sent-off. Munich won the match after netting a second away-goal and Rooney was substituted after re-damaging his ankle. On 25 April, Rooney was named the 2010 PFA Players' Player of the Year.


==== 201011 season ====
On 28 August 2010, Rooney scored his first goal of the season as he netted a penalty in a 30 home win over West Ham United. In October, Manchester United manager Sir Alex Ferguson stated at a press conference that Rooney wanted to quit the club. This came after a period of dispute as to the extent of Rooney's ankle injury, where Rooney had refuted Ferguson's claim that the injury was the reason Rooney had been dropped to the bench. Rooney and his representatives released a statement regarding his decision to leave the club, insisting it was not down to money but ambition. Following this statement, Rooney made a dramatic U-turn and agreed a new five-year contract at Manchester United until June 2015.

Rooney made his return to the first team as a substitute against Wigan on 20 November. Four days later he returned to the starting line-up and scored a penalty in a 10 away win over Rangers in the Champions League. He missed a penalty in a 10 home win over Arsenal on 13 December. His first goal of the season from open play came on 1 January 2011 in a 21 away win over West Bromwich Albion. On 1 February, Rooney scored twice and assisted Nemanja Vidi's goal in a 31 home win over Aston Villa. On 12 February, Rooney scored an overhead bicycle kick in the 78th minute of the Manchester derby, which proved to be the winning goal in their 21 win over Manchester City. After the match, Rooney said it was the best goal of his career, before Sir Alex Ferguson described the strike as the best goal he had ever witnessed at Old Trafford. Two weeks later he scored the third goal in a 40 away win over Wigan, before opening the scoring in a 21 away loss to Chelsea on 1 March. Rooney scored the second goal in a 20 home win over Arsenal in an FA Cup tie on 12 March.

On 2 April, United came from two goals down as Rooney scored his first hat-trick of the season in a 42 away win over West Ham United. This was his fifth hat-trick for Manchester United, whilst the second goal was his 100th in the Premier League for the club. He became the third Manchester United player to score 100 Premier League goals, joining Ryan Giggs and Paul Scholes. During Rooney's celebrations following his third goal, he swore into a pitchside camera and was subsequently charged by the Football Association for using offensive language. Rooney accepted the charge, but not the automatic two-match ban which was handed to him. He appealed against the length of the suspension, calling it "excessive", but failed to overturn the ban, which ruled him out of the FA Cup semi-final against Manchester City on 16 April. The following game on 6 April saw Rooney score the only goal in a 10 away win against Chelsea in the Champions League quarter-final first leg. He followed this goal up with another strike in the semi-final first leg against German side Schalke on 26 April, scoring the second of a 20 away win. This was the first time Rooney had returned to the Veltins-Arena in Gelsenkirchen since his sending off during the 2006 FIFA World Cup against Portugal.
On 14 May 2011, Rooney scored a penalty for United to equalise in a 11 draw against Blackburn Rovers at Ewood Park in the penultimate game of the Premier League season  enough to secure a record 19th top division title for United, and giving Rooney his fourth Premier League title winner's medal.


==== 201112 season ====
Rooney started the season with a goal in the first league game at The Hawthorns against West Bromwich Albion. Rooney played a one-two with Ashley Young before a sharp turn and finish from outside the box which found the bottom corner of the goal. He also scored in the second game of the season, at home to Tottenham Hotspur, when he headed in a Ryan Giggs cross.
In late August, Rooney scored his 150th goal for United, the first of a hat-trick, helping to beat Arsenal 82. Rooney won man of the match, scoring two free kicks, a penalty, and also contributing an assist for Nani. On 10 September, Rooney scored another hat-trick in a 50 away win over Bolton Wanderers on 10 September, becoming only the fourth player in Premier League history to score a hat-trick in consecutive games. These goals brought him level with Sir Bobby Charlton on seven United hat-tricks, joint fourth on the all-time list behind Denis Law, Jack Rowley and Dennis Viollet.
After the fallout from his red card against Montenegro on international duty, Rooney was left out of the starting line-up against Liverpool on 15 October 2011. He returned to action on 18 October 2011, where he scored two goals in the group stage-match against Oelul Galai and surpassed his former teammate Paul Scholes as the most-scoring Englishman in UEFA Champions League.
On 10 December, Rooney ended an 8-game goal drought with a brace against Wolves in a 41 win at Old Trafford. On 18 December, Rooney continued his goal scoring form heading home the opening goal against Queens Park Rangers, making it Manchester United's quickest goal of the season so far after just 52 seconds at Loftus Road. He was assisted by Antonio Valencia's cross. On 21 December, Rooney scored his 130th Premier League goal in his 300th Premier League appearance against Fulham at Craven Cottage with a long-range effort that crashed in off the inside of the post in a 50 win.

On 8 January, Rooney scored two goals in the FA Cup third round 32 away win against Manchester City at Etihad Stadium. His first goal was assisted by Antonio Valencia. With these goals, Rooney went past Mark Hughes in United's all-time top goalscorers table heading up to seventh place overall with 164 goals. On 14 January, Rooney made a big contribution to his team in a 30 home win against Bolton. Although he missed a penalty, he did create two goals by assisting Paul Scholes for the first goal and Danny Welbeck for the second one. On 5 February, Rooney scored twice from the penalty spot as United came back from a 30 deficit to draw 33 in a Premier League clash against Chelsea at Stamford Bridge.
On 11 February 2012, Rooney marked his 500th senior career game by scoring two goals as United beat rivals Liverpool 21 at Old Trafford. This was also his 350th game for United in all competitions. On 4 March, Rooney scored the first goal in a 31 away win against Tottenham Hotspur at White Hart Lane and went past Joe Spence in Manchester United's all-time top goalscorers table heading up to sixth place overall with 169 goals. He scored another brace in his next game, against Atletico Bilbao in the Europa League. On 11 March, Rooney scored the two goals that brought United the victory against West Bromwich Albion in a 20 home win. On 15 March, Rooney scored in the 2nd leg of the Europa League tie vs Athletic Bilbao in Bilbao despite United losing 21 on the night and 53 on aggregate.


==== 201213 season ====
Despite starting the opening game of the season against Everton, Rooney was dropped to the bench for the second game against Fulham in favour of new signing Robin van Persie. After coming on for Shinji Kagawa in the 68th minute, Rooney suffered a severe gash to his right leg caused by Fulham's Hugo Rodallega that kept him out for four weeks. He made his comeback on 29 September in a 32 loss against Tottenham.
Rooney scored his first goals of the season in a 42 league win at home to Stoke City on 20 October, where he reached his 200th club goal. On 7 November, he scored his first UEFA Champions League goal of the season, scoring a penalty in a 31 win against S.C. Braga. He scored twice and assisted a goal in a 43 win against Reading on 1 December. He scored a brace in the Manchester derby at the City of Manchester Stadium on 9 December 2012 which United won 32. On 16 January, he scored a goal against West Ham United in the FA Cup. A fortnight later, he scored twice in a 21 win against Southampton. He continued to score goals in FA Cup consecutive matches against Fulham and Chelsea. On 12 May, Sir Alex Ferguson announced, after United's 21 win against Swansea City, that Rooney had handed in his transfer request, a match in which Rooney also requested not to play.


==== 201314 season ====
On 5 July 2013, new United manager David Moyes announced that Rooney was not for sale, after speculation that Chelsea, Arsenal, Real Madrid and Paris Saint-Germain were among the clubs looking to sign him. On 17 July 2013, Chelsea confirmed that they had made a bid for Rooney the previous day, thought to be in the region of 20 million, however it had been rejected by Manchester United. He suffered a head gash in training on 31 August after a collision with Phil Jones which kept him out of the match against Liverpool. He scored his first goal of the season with a free-kick in a 20 win against Crystal Palace.
On 17 September, Rooney scored twice in a 42 win against Bayer Leverkusen in the UEFA Champions League, marking his 200th goal for United in the process. On 22 September, Rooney scored a wonderful free-kick at the eleventh hour to grab a consolation goal in the 41 thrashing against their neighbour, Manchester City, in the Manchester derby. He scored a brace against Tottenham Hotspur at White Hart Lane in a 22 draw on 1 December. He scored his 150th league goal for the club with a volley against Hull City on 26 December as United came back from 20 deficit to win the match 32; he also provided assists for the other two goals.
On 21 February 2014, Rooney signed a contract extension with Manchester United, which will keep him at Old Trafford until 2019. Rooney provided one assist to Robin van Persie, as Manchester United defeated Olympiakos in the second leg of UEFA Champions League. On 22 March 2014, Rooney scored two goals for United at West Ham United, moving him to third place on the club's all-time scoring list with 212 career goals.
Rooney ended the season as both the top scorer and assist for Manchester United in the league with 17 goals and 10 assists. He also had the most assists in the 20132014 Champions League with 8 assists, beating 2nd place ngel Di Mara who had 6 assists.


==== 201415 season ====
After the departure of Nemanja Vidi from Manchester United in July 2014, Rooney was named by new manager Louis van Gaal as his replacement as club captain ahead of the 201415 season.
On the opening day of the season on 16 August, Rooney scored a bicycle kick to equalise against Swansea City, although United eventually lost 12.
On 27 September 2014, Rooney became the third highest Premier League top-scorer of all time moving ahead of Thierry Henry with 176 goals after he netted a goal in a 21 victory against West Ham United. In the same match, he was sent off for a foul on Stewart Downing and received a three-game suspension.
On 22 November 2014, Rooney scored for United in a 21 win against rivals Arsenal, their first away win of the season. He continued to score in the following match, in a 30 win over Hull City. On 14 December, he scored the opening goal in a 30 win over rivals Liverpool. On 26 December, Rooney scored two goals against Newcastle United, a match which his side won 31  United's 50th successive Boxing Day match. For his performances, Rooney was voted as United's Player of the Month for December. During the season Rooney was often deployed as a midfielder by manager Louis van Gaal.
On 16 February 2015, in an FA Cup match against Preston, Rooney was the subject of criticism for having dived to get a penalty; United would go on to win the match 31. Replay seemed to have shown that Rooney hadn't come in contact with the goalkeeper. However, England manager Roy Hodgson defended Rooney, saying that he was forced to take evasive action. Rooney later apologised for his behaviour, saying: "that was my chance to get a penalty. I had to use that." The penalty was also Rooney's first goal in 2015, ending a goalless run. On 28 February 2015, he scored a brace in a 20 victory over Sunderland, thus becoming the first player to score more than 10 goals in 11 successive seasons. On 15 March, Rooney scored the third goal in a 30 win over Tottenham.
Rooney was Manchester United's top goalscorer for the 201415 campaign, but his tally of 14 is the lowest by a leading scorer since 1982. United's total goals of 62 were also their second worst in the Premier League era.


== International career ==


=== Early international career and Euro 2004 ===
Rooney was eligible to represent the Republic of Ireland, through an Irish grandmother. In 2015 he confirmed that he had rejected an approach from Ireland at the age of 16, describing himself as "English through and through".
Rooney became the youngest player to play for England when he earned his first cap in a friendly defeat against Australia at the Boleyn Ground on 12 February 2003 at 17 years and 111 days, coming on at half time as manager Sven-Gran Eriksson fielded a different team in each half. On 6 September of that year, aged 17 years and 317 days, he became the youngest player to score for England, equalising in a 21 away victory over Macedonia in a UEFA Euro 2004 qualifying match.
His first tournament action was at UEFA Euro 2004, in which he became the youngest scorer in competition history on 17 June 2004, when he scored twice against Switzerland; however, this record was topped by Swiss midfielder Johan Vonlanthen four days later. Rooney suffered an injury in the quarter-final match against Portugal, and England were eliminated on penalties. After scoring four goals in four matches, Rooney was named in UEFA's Team of the Tournament.


=== 2006 and 2010 World Cups ===
Following a foot injury in an April 2006 Premier League match, Rooney faced a race to fitness for the 2006 FIFA World Cup. England attempted to hasten his recovery with the use of an oxygen tent, which allowed Rooney to enter a group match against Trinidad and Tobago and start the next match against Sweden. However, he never got back into game shape and went scoreless as England bowed out in the quarter-finals, again on penalty kicks.

Rooney was red-carded in the 62nd minute of the quarter-final for stamping on Portugal defender Ricardo Carvalho as both attempted to gain possession of the ball, an incident that occurred right in front of referee Horacio Elizondo. Rooney's Manchester United teammate Cristiano Ronaldo openly protested his actions, and was in turn shoved by Rooney. Elizondo sent Rooney off, after which Ronaldo was seen winking at the Portugal bench. Rooney denied intentionally targeting Carvalho in a statement on 3 July, adding, "I bear no ill feeling to Cristiano but I'm disappointed that he chose to get involved. I suppose I do, though, have to remember that on that particular occasion we were not teammates." Elizondo confirmed the next day that Rooney was dismissed solely for the infraction on Carvalho. Rooney was fined CHF5,000 for the incident.
Rooney top scored for England in their 2010 FIFA World Cup qualifying campaign with nine goals; one behind the UEFA section's overall top goalscorer, Theofanis Gekas of Greece. On 14 November 2009, Rooney captained England for the first time in a pre-tournament friendly with Brazil.
During the 2010 FIFA World Cup in South Africa England drew with Algeria and the England players were booed off the pitch by supporters. England were eliminated in the second round.


=== Euro 2012 ===

The UEFA Euro 2012 qualification campaign went well for England, as they qualified at the top of their group, winning five and drawing three games. Rooney scored three goals, one against Switzerland and two against Bulgaria. In the last qualifier against Montenegro (22), Rooney was sent off for a tackle on Miodrag Dudovi in the 74th minute. It was anticipated that Rooney would miss at least one match in the opening round of the first phase at UEFA Euro 2012. After the game Rooney sent a personal letter to UEFA in which he apologised and expressed regret for the tackle on Dudovi which earned him the red card. Despite the letter, UEFA punished Rooney with a three-game ban, meaning that he could not play in any of the group stage matches. After UEFA's announcement, Dudovi stated that he believed the sentence for Rooney was too severe and that he would defend him if needed. He later asked the UEFA to pardon Rooney. The Football Association then decided they would appeal to UEFA against the ban. On 8 December 2011, after The FA had appealed the ban, UEFA reduced the sentence to two matches. This meant that Rooney missed the matches against France and Sweden. He was able to play in the final match of the group stage against Ukraine on 19 June 2012, scoring the only goal of the game, allowing England to progress to the quarterfinals. England were eventually knocked out in the quarter-finals against Italy, who, after a scoreless 120 minutes, won 42 on penalties, although Rooney was able to net his spot-kick. After another international tournament in which the English media criticised Rooney's performances, Fabio Capello claimed Rooney "only plays well in Manchester".


=== 2014 World Cup ===
On 12 October 2012, Rooney became England's 5th highest goalscorer of all time after scoring his 30th and 31st international goals in a 2014 World Cup qualifier against San Marino. Rooney captained England for the first time in a competitive match in the same game. On 6 February 2013, Rooney scored in a 21 win against five-time world champions Brazil at Wembley in a friendly. In March, he scored goals against San Marino and Montenegro in World Cup qualifying, before scoring against Brazil again in a 22 draw on 2 June, in the official re-opening of the refurbished Maracan Stadium. On 11 October 2013, Rooney became England's all-time top goalscorer in competitive internationals when he scored his 27th competitive goal in a 41 World Cup qualifier against Montenegro. Rooney ended the 2014 FIFA World Cup qualification campaign as England's top scorer with seven goals.
At the 2014 FIFA World Cup, Rooney started in England's first group match against Italy, setting up Sturridge's temporary equaliser, in a 21 loss. In England's second 2014 FIFA World Cup group match against Uruguay at the Arena Corinthians, Rooney scored his first ever goal at a FIFA World Cup finals with a 75th minute equaliser in a 21 loss. England drew their final group match 00 against Costa Rica, and were eliminated from the World Cup, finishing last in their group; despite playing a part in both of England's goals, Rooney was criticised by English pundits for his performance in the tournament.


=== Euro 2016 ===
Following Steven Gerrard's international retirement after the 2014 FIFA World Cup, Roy Hodgson named Rooney as England's new captain. On 3 September 2014, in the first match of his captaincy, Rooney scored a penalty against Norway to give England a 10 friendly win. Later on he showed his leadership attribute by calling player-only meetings in September 2014 to reflect on the players' performance and discuss how they can do better as a team. "Obviously the manager gives us our game plan, but because we don't spend that much time together as a team we need to know and feel confident in what we're doing as a team together. In the meetings, you're having the players speak up who wouldn't normally speak up when coaches are there." Rooney said. On 15 November 2014, Rooney won his 100th England cap against Slovenia in a UEFA Euro 2016 qualifying match, scoring a penalty to equalise in a 31 win. In another qualifier away to the same opponents on 14 June 2015, Rooney scored the winner with four minutes remaining for a 32 victory, his 48th international goal putting him joint second in England's list alongside Gary Lineker, and one behind Bobby Charlton.


== Style of play ==
Rooney is an energetic, creative forward, who combines technical skill with strength and physicality, which enables him to excel in the air, despite not being particularly tall. He is a versatile attacker, capable of playing anywhere along the front line, as a striker, supporting forward, or even as a winger. In more recent years, he has even been deployed in a deeper, more creative role, as an attacking midfielder, or even as a central or box-to-box midfielder under van Gaal, due to his passing and team-work. A prolific goalscorer, Rooney is a powerful striker of the ball and an accurate finisher, who is capable of scoring goals both inside and outside the penalty area, as well as from volleys. In addition to his offensive attributes, Rooney has been praised for his work-rate and stamina by players, managers and the media; he is highly regarded for his dedication and willingness to press opponents when possession has been lost in order to win back the ball and start attacking plays.
Due to his precocious displays as a teenager, Wayne Rooney was given the nicknames "Wazza" (a reference to former England international Paul "Gazza" Gascoigne, who was also a gifted player troubled by off-field issues), "The Wonder Boy", and "The White Pel". Rooney was a fast, agile player in his youth; however, several injuries throughout his career have affected his speed and mobility in recent years, which has led to some in the game accusing him of not quite living up to his full potential, on occasion. Despite his reputation as one of the top strikers of his generation, Rooney has been criticised for his behaviour and aggression on the pitch at times, which has led him to pick up unnecessary bookings.


== Personal life ==
In addition to Everton, Rooney also supports Celtic. He is also a supporter of the Leeds Rhinos rugby league club.
Rooney, originally a boxer, still pursues the sport recreationally for stress relief. In June 2011, he visited the Harley Street Hair Clinic and had a hair transplant. He has a number of tattoos, including one of a Celtic cross on his arm.


=== Family ===

Rooney met his wife, Coleen Rooney (ne McLoughlin), while both were at secondary school. They married on 12 June 2008 after six years of dating, during which Rooney admitted to soliciting prostitutes in Liverpool in 2004. "I was young and stupid. It was at a time when I was very young and immature and before I had settled down with Coleen." He has a tattoo of the words "Just Enough Education to Perform", the title of an album by his favourite band, the Stereophonics; Coleen arranged for the group to play at their wedding reception. The wedding ran into some controversy with the Catholic Church. The couple held a religious ceremony at the Abbey of Cervara, a converted monastery near Genoa, despite being warned by the local bishop's office against the plan. The bishop's office told the Rooneys that La Cervara is deconsecrated and not suitable for a wedding. It suggested a different church, five miles away. Nevertheless, the couple ignored the advice and Father Edward Quinn, their local Catholic priest from Croxteth, presided over the ceremony.
In April 2006, Rooney was awarded 100,000 in libel damages from tabloids The Sun and News of the World, who had claimed that he had assaulted Coleen in a nightclub. Rooney donated the money to charity.
Rooney's wife gave birth to a son on 2 November 2009, Kai Wayne. The couple's second child, Klay Anthony, was born on 21 May 2013.
Rooney's younger brother, John Rooney, is also a professional footballer who plays for Chester. He has previously played with Macclesfield Town, Barnsley and Bury, and in January 2011 signed a contract to play in Major League Soccer in the United States. John was selected by the New York Red Bulls in the second round of the 2011 MLS SuperDraft.


=== Commercial interests ===
Rooney has endorsement deals with Nike (he is the face of their T90 Laser IV boots), Nokia, Ford, Asda, and Coca-Cola. He appeared on six consecutive UK-version covers of Electronic Arts' FIFA series from FIFA 06 (2005) to FIFA 12 (2011). In October 2010, Rooney was dropped by Coca-Cola from one of its advertising campaigns following issues surrounding his private life. In 2012, Rooney was listed as the fifth highest-paid player in the world, behind Lionel Messi (1st), David Beckham (2nd) and Cristiano Ronaldo (3rd), with an annual income of $32.6 million.
It was announced in July 2011, that jerseys with Rooney's name and number were the best-selling sports product under the auspices of the Premier League. During the 200910 season, Manchester United sold between 1.2 million and 1.5 million shirts and it is estimated that of that, Rooney's name was printed on several hundred thousand. The account is taken from official jerseys sales across the globe, not just in England.
On 9 March 2006, Rooney signed the largest sports book deal in publishing history with HarperCollins, who granted him a 5 million advance plus royalties for a minimum of five books to be published over a twelve-year period. The first, My Story So Far, an autobiography ghostwritten by Hunter Davies, was published after the 2006 World Cup. The second publication, The Official Wayne Rooney Annual, was aimed at the teenage market and edited by football journalist Chris Hunt. Rooney's third book, My Decade in the Premier League, was published in September 2012.
In July 2006, Rooney's lawyers went to the United Nations' World Intellectual Property Organisation (WIPO) to gain ownership of the Internet domain names waynerooney.com and waynerooney.co.uk, both of which Welsh actor Huw Marshall registered in 2002. Three months later, the WIPO awarded Rooney the rights to waynerooney.com.


=== Social media ===
In October 2014, Rooney became the first Premier League footballer to reach 10 million followers on social networking site Twitter. As of October 2014, Rooney is the fifth most-followed footballer, and the sixth most-followed athlete globally on Twitter. In terms of top UK Twitter individuals, Rooney has also broken into the top 10, entering the list for the first time at number nine, one place ahead of Russell Brand.


=== Paul Stretford controversy ===
In July 2002, while Rooney was with Everton, agent Paul Stretford encouraged Rooney and his parents to enter the player into an eight-year contract with Proactive Sports Management. However, Rooney was already with another representation firm at the time, while Stretford's transaction went unreported to the FA, and he was thus charged with improper conduct. Stretford alleged in his October 2004 trial that he had secretly recorded boxing promoter John Hyland and two other men threatening and attempting to blackmail him for an undisclosed percentage of Rooney's earnings.
Stretford's case collapsed due to evidence that conflicted with his insistence that he had not signed Rooney, and on 9 July 2008, he was found guilty of "making of false and/or misleading witness statements to police, and giving false and/or misleading testimony." In addition, the contract to which Stretford had signed Rooney was two years longer than the limit allowed by the FA. Stretford was fined 300,000 and given an 18-month ban as a football agent, a verdict he appealed.
Stretford left Proactive in 2008 and took Rooney with him. Proactive later sued Rooney, claiming 4.3 million in withheld commissions. In July 2010, Proactive was awarded 90,000 as restitution.


=== David Moyes ===
On 1 September 2006, Everton manager David Moyes sued Rooney for libel after the tabloid newspaper the Daily Mail published excerpts from Rooney's 2006 autobiography that accused the manager of leaking Rooney's reasons for leaving the club to the press. The case was settled out of court for 500,000 on 3 June 2008, and Rooney apologised to Moyes for "false claims" he had made in the book regarding the matter.


=== Allegations of infidelity ===
Prostitute Helen Wood claims Rooney paid 1,000 for a threesome with her and Jennifer Thompson in a Manchester hotel whilst his wife was five months pregnant. It was reported his solicitors unsuccessfully tried to fight the allegations when they first surfaced in early August 2010.


== Career statistics ==


=== Club ===
Statistics accurate as of 23 May 2015.


=== International ===
Statistics accurate as of match played 7 June 2015


== Honours ==


=== Club ===
Manchester United
Premier League (5): 200607, 200708, 200809, 201011, 201213
Football League Cup (2): 200506, 200910
FA Community Shield (3): 2007, 2010, 2011
UEFA Champions League (1): 200708
FIFA Club World Cup (1): 2008


=== Individual ===
PFA Players' Player of the Year (1): 200910
PFA Young Player of the Year (2): 200405, 200506
PFA Fans' Player of the Year (2): 200506, 200910
PFA Premier League Team of the Year (3): 200506, 200910, 201112
Football Writers' Player of the Year (1): 200910
Sir Matt Busby Player of the Year (2): 200506, 200910
BBC Young Sports Personality of the Year (1): 2002
Bravo Award (1): 2003
Golden Boy Award (1): 2004
UEFA Euro 2004 Team of the Tournament
FIFPro World Young Player of the Year (1): 200405
Premier League Player of the Season (1): 200910
Premier League Player of the Month (5): February 2005, December 2005, March 2006, October 2007, January 2010
England Player of the Year (3): 2008, 2009, 2014
FIFA Club World Cup Golden Ball (1): 2008
FIFA FIFPro World XI (1): 2011
Premier League 20 Seasons Awards (199293 to 201112): Best Goal (vs. Manchester City, 12 February 2011)


== References ==


== External links ==
Official website
Wayne Rooney profile ManUtd.com
Wayne Rooney career statistics at Soccerbase
Wayne Rooney  FIFA competition record
Wayne Rooney  UEFA competition recordChristopher Lloyd "Chris" Smalling (born 22 November 1989) is an English professional footballer who plays as a centre-back for Manchester United and the England national team.
During his youth, Smalling played for the Millwall academy before joining local non-league side Maidstone United. He was selected for the Kent Schools Under-16 squad in 2005 before progressing to the Under-18s in 2007, and his performances for Kent Schools resulted in him being selected to play for the England Schools Under-18 squad in 2008. During this time Smalling had also established himself in the Maidstone United first team, and his impressive displays for club and country led to him signing a two-year deal with Middlesbrough in May 2008.
Barely a month after signing for Middlesbrough however, Smalling had his contract with the club terminated after raising concerns with home sickness. Shortly after, in June 2008, he signed for Premier League side Fulham. He made his professional debut with them in May 2009 in the final game of the 200809 season and helped them reach the 2010 Europa League final the following season.
In January 2010, Smalling signed a pre-contract agreement with Manchester United and joined them officially on 1 July. He made his competitive debut in the 2010 Community Shield victory over Chelsea which earned him his first career medal. Since his debut, he has gone on to make more than 100 appearances for the club.
Smalling has represented England at various levels and is currently a member of the England senior squad. He played for the England Schools Under-18 team in early 2008 before making his debut for the Under-20 side and the Under-21 side in 2009. He made his debut for the England senior squad in the 30 win over Bulgaria on 2 September 2011.


== Career ==


=== Maidstone United ===
Smalling was born in Greenwich, London. He began playing football in 1998 for Walderslade. After a short spell at Millwall's academy, a 16-year-old Smalling joined Maidstone United's youth set-up and continued his education at Chatham Grammar School for Boys.
After rising through Maidstone's youth and reserve team set-up under the tutelage of coaches Peter Nott and Tony Cornwell, Smalling made his first-team debut for 'The Stones' on 11 April 2007 in a 41 loss against Tonbridge Angels in the Kent Senior Cup. After making further appearances in the FA Trophy and Isthmian League Cup, December 2007 saw Smalling made his league debut for the club playing the full 90 minutes in a 11 draw against Harlow Town. Smalling impressed and quickly established himself as a vital part of Maidstone's backline, however injury and international duty restricted him to making only 11 more appearances for the Kent side. Smalling scored one goal for Maidstone, scoring in a 42 win at East Thurrock United on 24 March 2008, a game which was also his last for the club.


=== Fulham ===

After attracting strong interest from Fulham, Gillingham, Charlton Athletic and Reading, Smalling signed for Middlesbrough on a two-year deal on 30 April 2008. However soon after his contract with Boro was cancelled with Smalling concerned about homesickness, and in June 2008 he signed for Premier League side Fulham. Smalling was not on a contract at Maidstone (as it would have prohibited him from playing for England Schoolboys), and as such the Isthmian League club were not entitled to a fee for the player, however Fulham struck a deal which saw Maidstone given 10,000 upon the transfer and 10,000 for every 10 league games he played. He was made captain of the club's Development Squad by manager Billy McKinlay.
On 24 May 2009, Smalling made his Premier League debut for Fulham, replacing Aaron Hughes in the 77th minute in the final game of the 200809 season in a 20 home loss to Everton. Smalling made his first start for Fulham in on 17 September, in an away tie with CSKA Sofia in the UEFA Europa League with the match ending 11. On 28 December, Smalling made his first league start for Fulham, in a 21 loss against Chelsea at Stamford Bridge in Fulham's final game of 2009 and scored a decisive own goal in the 75th minute of the match.


=== Manchester United ===
On 27 January 2010, Manchester United announced that they had signed Smalling, for an undisclosed fee, with the player staying at Fulham for the remainder of the 200910 season before joining United for the beginning 201011 campaign. The transfer officially went through on 1 July.
He made his Manchester United debut in a 31 friendly win over Celtic on 16 July and conceded a penalty which led to Celtic's goal. He scored his first goal for the club in a 32 friendly defeat against Chivas Guadalajara on 30 July, heading in a corner from Darron Gibson. Smalling made his competitive debut for United on 8 August in the 2010 Community Shield, appearing as a second-half substitute in a 31 win over Chelsea. His Premier League debut for United came in their 30 home win over West Ham United on 28 August, coming on as a 74th-minute substitute for Jonny Evans. On 15 September, he made his Champions League debut, playing the full 90 minutes in a 00 draw at home against Rangers. Eight days later, Smalling scored his first goal for Manchester United, also his first senior career goal, in a 52 away win over Scunthorpe United in the League Cup. Smalling then made his full Premier League debut for United on 4 January 2011, partnering Nemanja Vidi for the full 90 minutes in a 21 home win against Stoke City. On 8 July 2011, Smalling signed a new five-year contract with United.

Smalling scored his first goal of the 201112 season in the 2011 Community Shield against United's local rivals Manchester City, volleying an Ashley Young free kick from close range to reduce the deficit to 21. Manchester United went on to win the game 32 and take the Shield. The new season also saw Smalling adapt to a new role, as early injuries to Nemanja Vidi, Rio Ferdinand and Rafael allowed Smalling, Jonny Evans and new signing Phil Jones to replace them. Evans and Jones played as central defenders whereas Smalling was deployed as a right-back. Smalling scored his first ever Premier League goal against title rivals Chelsea at Old Trafford on 18 September 2011, rising unmarked to place a header into the far corner to open the scoring, in a game United went on to win 31. Smalling was ruled out of the last Premier League fixture of the season and also for England's UEFA Euro 2012 campaign due to a groin injury he sustained during Manchester United's 20 win over Swansea City in the penultimate week of the Premier League season.
It was announced on 21 July 2012, that Smalling would miss the start of the season after being ruled out for 10 weeks after undergoing surgery on a broken metatarsal. The injury ruled him out of the entire pre-season tour. He made his return on 7 November, playing the full 90 minutes in a 31 win away to Portuguese side Braga in the UEFA Champions League. He made his Premier League return three days later, helping his side to a 32 win against Aston Villa. On 27 November 2013, Smalling scored his first UEFA Champions League goal in a 50 win away to Bayer Leverkusen. On 26 December, he scored in a 32 win against Hull City.
Smalling was sent off in the first half of United's 10 defeat in the Manchester derby on 2 November 2014. Manager Louis van Gaal deemed Smalling "stupid" for his second yellow card in the match, a foul on James Milner. However, Smalling returned to action playing the full 90 minutes in a 21 away victory over Arsenal. On 29 November, he scored his first Premier League goal of the season in a 30 victory over Hull City at Old Trafford, it was also his first Old Trafford goal in three years. On 11 February 2015, Smalling scored the first brace of his career after appearing as a fifth-minute substitute in a 31 victory against Burnley. On 12 April 2015, he scored his fourth goal of the season in a 42 win over Manchester City.
On 21 April 2015, Smalling signed a new contract with Manchester United, keeping him at the club until June 2019. Having been praised by manager Louis van Gaal for his command of the defensive unit, Smalling captained United for the first time on 17 May 2015 during a 11 draw against Arsenal.


== International career ==


=== England youth teams ===
At the age of 17 and studying for his A Levels, Smalling was selected to represent his county (Kent), and the Kent Schools' Football Association then nominated him for trials for the England Schoolboy international squad. His trial was successful, and Smalling was selected to represent England Schools against Australia in January 2008. England won 20, and Smalling went on to play for England in the Centenary Shield, playing all four matches which including 10 victory against Wales Schools in which he scored the only goal.
Smalling made his debut for the England Under20 team 31 March 2009, playing 45 minutes in a 20 win against Italy at Loftus Road. On 11 August, four months after his Under-20 debut, he made his debut for the Under21 squad in a friendly fixture against the Netherlands, coming on as a substitute in the 58th minute of a 00 away draw. On 14 November, Smalling made first start for the Under-21's in a 2011 U21 European Championship qualifier against Portugal at Wembley Stadium in a 10 win. He scored his first goal for the Under21's on 8 October 2010 against Romania in England's 2011 U21 European Championship play-off first leg, converting from inside the area after an assist from Daniel Sturridge. The goal, scored in the 83rd minute, proved to be the winner as England won 21.


=== England senior team ===
On 13 November 2010, Smalling was called up to the England senior squad for the first time for their friendly against France on 17 November; however, he was an unused substitute in the 21 loss. He made his senior debut in the Euro 2012 qualifier against Bulgaria on 2 September 2011, which England won 30, in which he played at right-back.
On 12 May 2014, Smalling was named in England's 23-man squad for the 2014 FIFA World Cup. With England's elimination already confirmed, Smalling was given a tournament debut as a starter in the final group match, helping the team to a clean sheet in a 00 draw with Costa Rica in Belo Horizonte.


== Career statistics ==


=== Club ===
As of match played on 24 May 2015.


=== International ===
Statistics accurate as of match played 14 June 2015.


== Honours ==


=== Club ===
Manchester United
Premier League (2): 201011, 201213
FA Community Shield (3): 2010, 2011, 2013


=== Individual ===
UEFA European Under-21 Football Championship Team of the Tournament (1): 2011


== Notes ==
^ Includes the FA Trophy and the FA Community Shield


== References ==


== External links ==
Chris Smalling career statistics at Soccerbase
Profile at ManUtd.comAshley Simon Young (born 9 July 1985) is an English professional footballer who plays as a winger for Manchester United and the English national team. Born and raised in Hertfordshire, Young's father was from Jamaica. Young started his career at Watford, making his first senior appearances in 2003 under the management of Ray Lewington. He became a first-team regular in 200405, and was one of Watford's key players in their promotion winning 200506 season. Young continued to play well for Watford in the Premier League, and in January 2007 he transferred to Aston Villa for a fee of 8 million, rising to 9.65 million with add-ons. He established himself in the first team at Villa Park, and has since earned 30 caps for England, scoring 7 goals. On 23 June 2011, Young signed for Manchester United for an undisclosed fee.


== Club career ==


=== Watford ===
Despite having been turned away by Watford's Academy after an unsuccessful spell, Young endeavoured to improve himself as a player and was eventually offered a professional deal by the club. The 18-year-old was handed his first team dbut under Ray Lewington in September 2003, scoring as a substitute against Millwall. He achieved five substitute appearances that season, scoring three goals, and made his first start for the club in the League Cup. Young came to prominence in the 200405 season, playing a part in 34 of Watford's league matches as they struggled to survive in the Championship. Although he failed to find the net, his performance during this season earned him the club's Young Player of the Season award.
Under Aidy Boothroyd in the 200506 season, Young was given a new lease of life as a striker and right winger. Young started 41 League matches, finding the net 15 times, including a playoff semi-final goal against Crystal Palace, as Watford qualified for the playoffs and eventually beat Leeds United 30 to gain promotion to the Premier League. During that season, Young scored a number of spectacular goals, including free-kicks against Plymouth and Leeds, a shot into the top corner from 30 yards out against Coventry City, and a curling shot against Queens Park Rangers. It was during this season, though, that Young was sent off for the first time in his career, in the local derby away at Luton Town.
Young began Watford's 200607 Premier League season well, scoring three times in the league, including a last minute strike in a 33 draw with Fulham (he had also scored Watford's second goal in the match), and a goal against Middlesbrough, in Watford's first win of the season in October. He also scored a free-kick in the League Cup. In the January 2007 transfer window, three clubs made 5 million offers for the Under-21 International. Watford rejected these approaches, as well as (as of 12 January 2007) an offer of 7 million, again from an unnamed club
An improved offer of nearly 10 million from West Ham United was accepted. However, Young rejected the move, opting to wait for offers from clubs for whom relegation was not an issue.


=== Aston Villa ===

On 18 January 2007, Aston Villa had an 8 million offer (rising to 9.75 million with add-ons), acceptedthe club's record transfer fee. This allowed manager Martin O'Neill and the Aston Villa board to discuss personal terms with the player. Two days later O'Neill confirmed the player had agreed to join the club. Young underwent a medical on 21 January and the signing was confirmed on 23 January 2007. On 31 January, he scored on his debut for Villa at St James' Park against Newcastle United, but Villa went on to lose 31. Young started the 200708 season well, receiving several Man of the Match awards, culminating in a call-up to the England squad.
In the 200708 Premier League season, Young finished second to Cesc Fbregas in assists with 17. Young was included in the Premier League Team of the Year, and apart from Portsmouth's David James, he was the only other player who did not come from any of the 'Big Four' (Chelsea, Arsenal, Liverpool and Manchester United) to make it into the best XI of the season. He is known for his pace, set pieces and ability to pass and shoot. He is also well known for cutting back onto his right foot and 'whipping' the ball into the penalty area.
On 20 April 2008, Young scored 2 goals and assisted two goals for Aston Villa against Birmingham City at Villa Park and Villa went on to win the game 51. He also scored the winner against Danish side Odense Boldklub in Villa's home leg of the Intertoto Cup 3rd round. On 10 October 2008 Young won the Player of the Month award. This was due to his performances in the 20082009 Premier League season. Having also won the award in April 2008, Young joins the list of players who have won the award more than once including Cristiano Ronaldo, Wayne Rooney and Steven Gerrard. On 7 December 2008 in the 32 win over Everton, Young scored two goals, one being an injury time winner after Everton's Joleon Lescott had equalised seconds earlier putting his tally for the season up to five. Manager Martin O'Neill later described the player as being 'world-class' in the post-match press conference. Ashley Young signed a new four-year contract until 2012 on 4 November 2008. On 10 January 2009 Young was again awarded Player of the Month for December along with O'Neill, who won the Manager of the Month award. He became the first ever player to win three FA Premiership Player of the Month awards in the same year. During a match against Sunderland on 18 January 2009, Young was sent off for a two-footed foul on Sunderland's Dean Whitehead.

Young appeared for Villa at the 2009 Peace Cup in Andalusia. He scored a header that was to be the third and final goal in a Group C match against Atlante as Villa triumphed 31. This was also the goal that sent Villa through to the knockout stages due to their superior goal difference in comparison to fellow group members Atlante and Mlaga. After helping Villa defeat Portuguese side Porto in the semi-final, Ashley Young scored a penalty in the final as Villa overcame Italian club Juventus. Villa won 43 on penalties, after the game had finished 00 in normal time. Young's performances in Spain earned him praise in the media.
On 24 August 2009 Young scored a penalty as Aston Villa won 31 against Liverpool at Anfield. He did, however, go on to miss a penalty on 27 August in a home tie in the UEFA Europa League against Rapid Vienna. Young won two penalties in the first half of the game (one that he missed, the other that was converted by James Milner) as Aston Villa were eliminated from the tournament on the away goals rule.
During the 201011 season, Young became vice-captain of the club and played in a new free role behind the striker, allowing him to move from wing to wing and through the centre. Young scored his first goal of the 201011 season with a direct free-kick in the Premier League game at home to Bolton Wanderers on 18 September 2010. He ended the season with nine goals and fourteen assists in 39 appearances for Villa in all competitions. With one year left to run on his current contract, Young stated that he would not make a decision on his future until the end of the season. On 20 June 2011, new Villa manager Alex McLeish admitted that he was resigned to losing Young, stating, "It's not confirmed yet but it does seem likely."


=== Manchester United ===

On 23 June 2011, Young completed a move to Manchester United for an undisclosed fee, reportedly between 15 million and 20 million, having passed a medical the day before, beating Liverpool to the signing. He signed a five-year deal with the club for an undisclosed fee. He was handed the #18 shirt previously worn by Paul Scholes. He made his debut on 13 July in a 41 friendly win against American club New England Revolution, playing 67 minutes on the right wing before being substituted. Young made his competitive debut for United in a 32 derby win over Manchester City in the 2011 Community Shield, playing the full 90 minutes and making an assist.
He made his league debut for United against West Bromwich Albion on 14 August 2011, setting up the first goal for Wayne Rooney and forcing an own goal after a run down the left flank and cross, in a 21 away win. He was named Man of The Match. He scored his first two goals for United on 28 August in an 82 victory against Arsenal at Old Trafford. Both occurring after cutting inside from the left flank and bending two right foot shots into the far corner. Young made his debut in the UEFA Champions League on 27 September 2011, scoring a headed goal in the 90th minute to help Manchester United to a 33 draw against Basel. After a long term injury, Ashley returned on the field at Stamford Bridge in a 33 Premier League draw against Chelsea on 5 February 2012. On 16 February, he scored a goal for the lead in a Europa League 20 away win against Ajax at the Amsterdam Arena. On 4 March 2012, Young scored two goals and made an assist against Tottenham Hotspur at White Hart Lane in a 31 Premier League win. On 2 April, he scored in a 20 win against Blackburn Rovers at Ewood Park.
On 4 March 2015, Young scored his first goal of the 201415 season in a 10 victory over Newcastle United. On 12 April, he was named Man of the Match after he scored the equalising goal and provided two assists in a 42 home win over Manchester City.
On 7 August 2015, Young signed a new three-year contract with Manchester United, keeping him at the club until June 2018, with the option to extend a further year.


== International career ==


=== Under-21s ===

As a result of his form for Watford during the 200506 season, in February 2006 Young earned a call-up to Peter Taylor's England U21 League squad to face an Italian Serie B squad alongside team-mate Chris Eagles. Young started alongside Eagles in the 10 win, playing the first half. His continued form into the 200607 season earned him a first England U21 call-up to face Switzerland U21s in September 2006. Young played the last 15 minutes of the match as England scored a late goal to win 32, topping their group, and reaching a playoff for a place in the 2007 UEFA European Under-21 Football Championship. At the finals, Young played three times. He took part in the epic semi-final shootout against hosts Netherlands, scoring twice in the shootout as England lost 1312.


=== Senior team ===


==== Early career ====
On 31 August 2007, Steve McClaren called Young up to the full England squad for the first time to face Russia and Israel in the Euro 2008 qualifiers. He was again called up for the Euro 2008 qualifiers to face Estonia and Russia. On 16 November 2007 Young finally made his international debut and came on as a half-time substitute for England in a friendly against Austria. He has since appeared in the England friendly against Germany in November 2008, coming on as a second-half substitute. He was also part of the starting XI in Fabio Capello's England squad in the friendly against the Netherlands at the Amsterdam Arena on 12 August 2009. Young did not make the cut in Capello's 30-man squad for the World Cup in South Africa.


==== Euro 2012 ====
On 12 October 2010, Young made his first start for England in a Euro 2012 qualifying match against Montenegro. He scored his first international goal in a friendly away to Denmark on 9 February 2011 in Copenhagen, which was the winning goal. Young also scored again against Switzerland on 4 June 2011, as he got the equaliser with a volley from the edge of the area, after coming off the bench for Frank Lampard at half-time. On 6 September 2011, Young scored the only goal for England in a Euro 2012 qualifying 10 win against Wales. On 7 October, he scored England's first goal away against Montenegro, and set up Darren Bent for the second. England went on to draw the match 22 and securing a qualification to Euro 2012. On 29 February 2012, Young scored his fifth international goal in a 23 home loss to Netherlands in a friendly match played at Wembley Stadium.
On 26 May 2012, Young scored his sixth, as well as his fourth straight, international goal in a Euro 2012 warm-up game against Norway. He became the first English footballer since Wayne Rooney to score in four straight international appearances. In his next game for England against Belgium he provided the assist for England's first goal. Young played in all four of England's matches at Euro 2012, culminating with a quarter-final defeat to Italy on penalties; Young was one of two England players to miss their penalties as Italy won 42 to reach a semi-final against Germany.


== Personal life ==
Young was born in Stevenage, Hertfordshire. He has one older brother and two football-playing younger brothers, Lewis, who made his debut for Watford in 2008, and Kyle, who in April 2009 was training at the Arsenal Academy. Young attended The John Henry Newman School in Stevenage, and played school football alongside Formula One driver Lewis Hamilton, who was in the same year.
Young's Jamaican-born father supports Tottenham Hotspur, while Young himself, like his older brother, favoured Arsenal. His hero and "role model on and off the pitch" was Ian Wright.


== Career statistics ==


=== Club ===
Statistics accurate as of match played on 24 May 2015.


=== International ===
As of 10 September 2013.


== Honours ==


=== Club ===
Watford
Football League Championship play-offs (1): 2006
Manchester United
Premier League (1): 201213
FA Community Shield (1): 2011


=== Individual ===
Watford Young Player of the Season (1): 200405
PFA Championship Team of the Year (1): 200506
PFA Premier League Team of the Year (2): 200708, 200809
PFA Young Player of the Year (1): 200809
Premier League Player of the Month (3): April 2008, September 2008, December 2008


== Notes ==
^ Includes other competitive competitions, including the Championship play-offs and FA Community Shield.


== References ==


== External links ==
Profile at ManUtd.com
Profile at TheFA.com
Ashley Young career statistics at SoccerbaseJames Wilson (September 14, 1742  August 21, 1798) was one of the Founding Fathers of the United States and a signatory of the United States Declaration of Independence. Wilson was elected twice to the Continental Congress, where he represented Pennsylvania, and was a major force in drafting the United States Constitution. A leading legal theorist, he was one of the six original justices appointed by George Washington to the Supreme Court of the United States.


== Early life ==
One of seven children, Wilson was born to a Presbyterian farming family on September 14, 1742 near St. Andrews, Scotland to William Wilson and Alison Landall. He studied at the Universities of St. Andrews, Glasgow and Edinburgh, but never obtained a degree. While he was a student, he studied Scottish Enlightenment thinkers, including Francis Hutcheson, David Hume and Adam Smith. Imbued with the ideas of the Scottish Enlightenment he moved to Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, in British America in 1766, carrying valuable letters of introduction. These helped Wilson to begin tutoring and then teaching at The Academy and College of Philadelphia (now the University of Pennsylvania). He petitioned there for a degree and was awarded an honorary Master of Arts several months later.
Wilson began to read the law at the office of John Dickinson a short time later. After two years of study he attained the bar in Philadelphia, and in the following year (1767), set up his own practice in Reading, Pennsylvania. His office was very successful and he earned a small fortune in a few years. By then he had a small farm near Carlisle, Pennsylvania, was handling cases in eight local counties, became a founding trustee of Dickinson College, and was lecturing at The Academy and College of Philadelphia.
On November 5, 1771, he married Rachel Bird, daughter of William Bird and Bridget Hulings; they had six children together: Mary, William, Bird, James, Emily and Charles. Rachel died in 1786, and in 1793 he married Hannah Gray, daughter of Ellis Gray and Sarah D'Olbear; the marriage produced a son named Henry, who died at age three. After Wilson's death, Hannah married Thomas Bartlett, M.D.


== American Revolution ==
Wilson published in 1774 "Considerations on the Nature and Extent of the Legislative Authority of the British Parliament." In this pamphlet, Wilson argued that the Parliament had no authority to pass laws for the American colonies because the colonies had no representation in Parliament. It presented his views that all power derived from the people. Yet, he wrote that the people owed their allegiance to the English king: "A denial of the legislative authority of the British parliament over America is by no means inconsistent with that connexion, which ought to subsist between the mother country and her colonies." Scholars considered his work on par with the seminal works of Thomas Jefferson and John Adams of the same year, it was actually penned in 1768, perhaps the first cogent argument to be formulated against British dominance. Some see him as a leading revolutionary while others see him as another reluctant, elite revolutionary reacting to the stream of events determined by the radicals on the ground.
In 1775 he was commissioned Colonel of the 4th Cumberland County Battalion and rose to the rank of Brigadier General of the Pennsylvania State Militia.
As a member of the Continental Congress in 1776, James Wilson was a firm advocate for independence. Believing it was his duty to follow the wishes of his constituents, Wilson refused to vote until he had caucused his district. Only after he received more feedback did he vote for independence. While serving in the Congress, Wilson was clearly among the leaders in the formation of French policy. "If the positions he held and the frequency with which he appeared on committees concerned with Indian affairs are an index, he was until his departure from Congress in 1777 the most active and influential single delegate in laying down the general outline that governed the relations of Congress with the border tribes."
Wilson also served from June 1776 on the Committee on Spies, along with John Adams, Thomas Jefferson, John Rutledge, and Robert R. Livingston. They together defined treason. (Page, p. 119.)
On October 4, 1779, the Fort Wilson Riot began. After the British had abandoned Philadelphia, Wilson successfully defended at trial 23 people from property seizure and exile by the radical government of Pennsylvania. A mob whipped up by liquor and the writings and speeches of Joseph Reed, president of Pennsylvania's Supreme Executive Council, marched on Congressman Wilson's home at Third and Walnut Streets. Wilson and 35 of his colleagues barricaded themselves in his home, later nicknamed Fort Wilson. In the fighting that ensued, six died, and 17 to 19 were wounded. The city's soldiers, the First Troop Philadelphia City Cavalry and Baylor's 3rd Continental Light Dragoons, eventually intervened and rescued Wilson and his colleagues. The rioters were pardoned and released by Joseph Reed.
Wilson closely identified with the aristocratic and conservative republican groups, multiplied his business interests, and accelerated his land speculation. He became involved with the Illinois-Wabash company during the War for Independence and was made its president in 1780. He became the company's largest single investor, owning one and a half shares outright and two shares by proxy, totaling over one million acres of land. Wilson further expanded his land holdings by cofounding the Canna Company with Mark Bird, Robert Lettis Hooper, and William Bingham in order to sell land along the Susquehanna River in New York. Additionally, Wilson individually bought huge quantities of land in Pennsylvania in 1784 and 56,000 acres of land in Virginia during the 1780s. To round out his holdings, Wilson, in conjunction with Michael and Bernard Gratz,Levi Hollingsworth, Charles Willing, and Dorsey Pentecost purchased 321,000 acres of land south of the Ohio River. He also took a position as Advocate General for France in America (177983), dealing with commercial and maritime matters, and legally defended Loyalists and their sympathizers. He held this post until his death in 1798.


== Constitutional Convention ==
One of the most prominent lawyers of his time, Wilson is credited for being the most learned of the Framers of the Constitution. A fellow delegate in the Constitutional Convention of 1787 in Philadelphia made the following assessment of James Wilson: "Government seems to have been his peculiar study, all the political institutions of the world he knows in detail, and can trace the causes and effects of every revolution from the earliest stages of the Grecian commonwealth down to the present time."
Wilson's most lasting impact on the country came as a member of the Committee of Detail, which produced the first draft of the United States Constitution in 1787 (a year after the death of his first wife). He wanted senators and the president to be popularly elected. He also proposed the Three-Fifths Compromise at the convention, which made only three-fifths of the South's slave population total to be counted for purposes of distributing taxes and apportioning representation in the House and Electoral College. Along with James Madison, he was perhaps the best versed of the framers in the study of political economy. He understood clearly the central problem of dual sovereignty (nation and state) and held a vision of an almost limitless future for the United States. Wilson addressed the Convention 168 times. A witness to Wilsons performance during the convention, Dr. Benjamin Rush, called Wilson's mind "one blaze of light." Madison and Wilson not only far outdistanced the others at the Convention as political theorists, they were also two of the closest allies in both the convention debates and ratification effort afterward.
Though not in agreement with all parts of the final, necessarily compromised Constitution, Wilson stumped hard for its adoption, leading Pennsylvania, at its ratifying convention, to become the second state (behind Delaware) to accept the document. His October 6, 1787 "speech in the statehouse yard" (delivered in the courtyard behind Independence Hall) has been seen as particularly important in setting the terms of the ratification debate, both locally and nationally. It is second in influence behind The Federalist Papers. It was printed in newspapers and copies of the speech were distributed by George Washington to generate support for the ratification of the Constitution. In particular, it focused on the fact that there would be a popularly elected national government for the first time. He distinguished "three simple species of government" monarchy, aristocracy, and "a republic or democracy, where the people at large retain the supreme power, and act either collectively or by representation." Wilson was later instrumental in the redrafting of the Pennsylvania Constitution of 1776, leading the group in favor of a new constitution, and entering into an agreement with William Findley (leader of the Constitutionalist Party) that limited the partisan feeling that had previously characterized Pennsylvanian politics.


== Supreme Court career and final years ==
George Washington nominated Wilson to be an Associate Justice of the United States Supreme Court on September 24, 1789, after the court was implemented under the Judiciary Act of 1789. The United States Senate confirmed his appointment on September 26, 1789, and Washington commissioned Wilson on September 29, 1789. Only nine cases were heard by the court from his appointment in 1789 until his death in 1798.
He became the first professor of law at the College of Philadelphia in 1790only the second at any academic institution in the United Statesin which he mostly ignored the practical matters of legal training. Like many of his educated contemporaries, he viewed the academic study of law as a branch of a general cultured education, rather than solely as a prelude to a profession.
Wilson broke off his first course of law lectures in April 1791 to attend to his duties as Supreme Court justice on circuit. He appears to have begun a second-year course in late 1791 or in early 1792 (by which time the College of Philadelphia had been merged into the University of Pennsylvania), but at some unrecorded point the lectures stopped again and were never resumed. They were not published (except for the first) until after his death, in an edition produced by his son, Bird Wilson, in 1804. The University of Pennsylvania Law School in Philadelphia officially traces its foundation to Wilson's lectures.
Wilson's last and final years were marked by financial failures. He assumed heavy debts investing in land that became liabilities with the onset of the Panic of 17961797. Of note was the failure in Pennsylvania with Theophilus Cazenove. In debt, Wilson was briefly imprisoned in a Debtors' Prison in Burlington, New Jersey. His son paid the debt, but Wilson went to North Carolina to escape other creditors. He was again briefly imprisoned, but continued his duties on the Federal judicial circuit. In 1798, he suffered a bout of malaria and then died of a stroke at the age of 55, while visiting a friend in Edenton, North Carolina. He was buried in the Johnston cemetery on Hayes Plantation near Edenton, but was reinterred in 1906 at Christ Churchyard, Philadelphia.

Tracing over the events of Wilsons life, we are impressed by the lucid quality of his mind. With this went a restless energy and insatiable ambition, an almost frightening vitality that turned with undiminished energy and enthusiasm to new tasks and new ventures. Yet, when all has been said, the inner man remains, despite our probings, an enigma.  Charles Page Smith


== Jurisprudence ==
In the lectures mentioned above, James Wilson, among the first of American legal philosophers, worked through in more detail some of the thinking suggested in the opinions issuing at that time from the Supreme Court. He felt, in fact, compelled to begin by spending some time in arguing out the justification of the appropriateness of his undertaking a course of lectures. But he assures his students that: "When I deliver my sentiments from this chair, they shall be my honest sentiments: when I deliver them from the bench, they shall be nothing more. In both places I shall makebecause I mean to supportthe claim to integrity: in neither shall I makebecause, in neither, can I supportthe claim to infallibility." (First lecture, 1804 Philadelphia ed.)
With this, he raises the most important question of the era: having acted upon revolutionary principles in setting up the new country, "Why should we not teach our children those principles, upon which we ourselves have thought and acted? Ought we to instil into their tender minds a theory, especially if unfounded, which is contradictory to our own practice, built on the most solid foundation? Why should we reduce them to the cruel dilemma of condemning, either those principles which they have been taught to believe, or those persons whom they have been taught to revere?" (First lecture.)
That this is no mere academic question is revealed with a cursory review of any number of early Supreme Court opinions. Perhaps it is best here to quote the opening of Justice Wilson's opinion in Chisholm v. State of Georgia, 2 U.S. 419 (1793), one of the most momentous decisions in American history: "This is a case of uncommon magnitude. One of the parties to it is a State; certainly respectable, claiming to be sovereign. The question to be determined is, whether this State, so respectable, and whose claim soars so high, is amenable to the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the United States? This question, important in itself, will depend on others, more important still; and, may, perhaps, be ultimately resolved into one, no less radical than this 'do the people of the United States form a Nation?'"
In order to arrive at an answer to this question, one that would provide the foundation for the United States of America, Wilson knew that legal thinkers had to resolve in their minds clearly the question of the difference between "the principles of the constitutions and governments and laws of the United States, and the republics, of which they are formed" and the "constitution and government and laws of England." He made it quite clear that he thought the American items to be "materially better." (First lecture.)


== See also ==


== Notes ==
Works of James Wilson 3 vol (1804) online edition
Collected Works of James Wilson, 2 vols. Edited by Kermit L. Hall and Mark David Hall. Indianapolis: Liberty Fund Press, 2007.
Hall, Mark David (1997). The Political and Legal Philosophy of James Wilson, 17421798. Columbia: University of Missouri Press. ISBN 0-8262-1103-8. 
Read, James H. (2000). Power Versus Liberty: Madison, Hamilton, Wilson, and Jefferson. Charlottesville: University Press of Virginia. ISBN 0-8139-1911-8. 
Wexler, Natalie (2007). A More Obedient Wife: A Novel of the Early Supreme Court. Washington: Kalorama Press. ISBN 0-615-13516-1. 


== Further reading ==
Brooks, Christopher (2006). Chisholm to Alden: James Wilson's Artificial Person in American Supreme Court History, 17931999. Berlin: Logos Verlag. ISBN 3-8325-1342-6.
Cushman, Clare (2001). The Supreme Court Justices: Illustrated Biographies, 17891995 (2nd ed.). (Supreme Court Historical Society, Congressional Quarterly Books). ISBN 1-56802-126-7. 
Ewald, William. "James Wilson and the Drafting of the Constitution," University of Pennsylvania Journal of Constitutional Law, 10 (June 2008), 9011009.
Flanders, Henry. The Lives and Times of the Chief Justices of the United States Supreme Court. Philadelphia: J. B. Lippincott & Co., 1874 at Google Books.
Frank, John P. (1995). Friedman, Leon; Israel, Fred L., eds. The Justices of the United States Supreme Court: Their Lives and Major Opinions. Chelsea House Publishers. ISBN 0-7910-1377-4. 
Hall, Kermit L., ed. (1992). The Oxford Companion to the Supreme Court of the United States. New York: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-505835-6. 
Martin, Fenton S.; Goehlert, Robert U. (1990). The U.S. Supreme Court: A Bibliography. Washington, D.C.: Congressional Quarterly Books. ISBN 0-87187-554-3. 
Pedersen, Nicholas K., "James Wilson: The Lost Founder", Yale Journal of Law & Humanities, 22 (2010), 257337.
Smith, Charles Page (1956). James Wilson, Founding Father, 17421798. Chapel Hill, NC: University of North Carolina Press. 
Urofsky, Melvin I. (1994). The Supreme Court Justices: A Biographical Dictionary. New York: Garland Publishing. p. 590. ISBN 0-8153-1176-1. 
Witt, John Fabian (2007). "The pyramid and the machine : founding visions in the life of James Wilson". Patriots and Cosmopolitans: Hidden Histories of American Law. 


== References ==


== External links ==
James Wilson at the Biographical Directory of the United States Congress
James Wilson at the Biographical Directory of Federal Judges, a public domain publication of the Federal Judicial Center.
Declaration Signers biography of James Wilson
Penn Law School biography of James Wilson
Biography by Rev. Charles A. Goodrich, 1856
Biography and portrait at the University of Pennsylvania
Portrait at the University of Pennsylvania Law School
James Wilson at Find a Grave
James Wilson at the Notable Names Database
ExplorePAHistory.com
 "Wilson, James". Appletons' Cyclopdia of American Biography. 1889. 
The James Wilson papers, which contain a variety of material on the early federal government and on James Wilson's business and professional activities, are available for research use at the Historical Society of Pennsylvania.
James Wilson Institute on Natural Rights and the American FoundingSergio Germn Romero (born 22 February 1987) is an Argentine footballer who plays as a goalkeeper for English club Manchester United and the Argentina national team.
He made his debut with Racing Club in the Argentine Primera Divisin in 2007 and then transferred to Dutch club AZ at the end of the season. He won the Eredivisie in 2009 and two years later joined Sampdoria.
A full international with over 60 caps since 2009, Romero has represented Argentina at two World Cups and as many Copa Amrica tournaments, finishing as runner-up once in each competition. He also was part of their team which won gold at the 2008 Olympics.


== Club career ==


=== Racing Club ===
Romero passed from the youth to the first team of Racing Club de Avellaneda in 2006, making his debut in the Argentine Primera Divisin.


=== AZ ===
In 2007, Romero signed for AZ, managed by Louis van Gaal. Due to an injury to first-choice goalkeeper Boy Waterman, Romero made his Eredivisie debut on 30 September against Heracles Almelo, eventually becoming a regular as the team came 11th.
In 200809, Romero kept a 950-minute clean sheet for AZ from November to February. However, on 5 March 2009, he made a mistake which allowed NAC Breda's Nourdin Boukhari to score for a 21 defeat in the quarter-finals of the KNVB Cup; he responded after the game by punching the door and walls of his team's changing room, breaking bones in his hand and ruling himself out at a crucial stage of the season. He returned on 26 April after Joey Didulica got injured in a clash with Luis Surez. As AZ won the Eredivisie, he made his debut with the club in the UEFA Champions League and UEFA Europa League in the following season.


=== Sampdoria ===
On 22 August 2011, Romero was signed by UC Sampdoria for 2.1 million in a 4-year contract, relegated the previous season to Serie B. He made his debut four days later at home against Calcio Padova. The season ended with Sampdoria in sixth place, and after victories over U.S. Sassuolo Calcio and AS Varese 1910 in the playoffs, they earned promotion to Serie A.
For the 201314 season, Romero was loaned to AS Monaco of Ligue 1. Second choice behind Danijel Subai, he played three league games as the team finished as runners-up to Paris Saint-Germain. After his return to Sampdoria, he was most often the backup to Emiliano Viviano.


=== Manchester United ===
On 27 July 2015, Manchester United completed the signing of Romero on a free transfer. He penned a three-year contract, with the option to extend for a further year, and reunited with his former AZ manager Van Gaal.


== International career ==

Romero represented Argentina at the 2007 South American Youth Championship in Paraguay and at the 2007 FIFA U-20 World Cup in Canada where on 8 August 2007 Romero was first included in the Argentine selection for a friendly match against Norway and against Australia, which Argentina also went on to win. He replaced injured Oscar Ustari at the 2008 Summer Olympics football tournament.
Romero was called up to the full senior side by then coach Diego Maradona debuting on 9 September 2009 in a 10 win FIFA World Cup qualifier against Paraguay and playing in the win against Uruguay in Montevideo that saw Argentina qualify for the 2010 FIFA World Cup. He played in all five of Argentina's World Cup matches which ended at the quarter-final stage.
Romero was part of Sergio Batista's 2011 Copa Amrica squad in which Argentina the hosts lost to Uruguay on penalties in the quarter-finals. He retained his position as number one choice under new coach Alejandro Sabella for the ongoing 2014 FIFA World Cup qualifiers.
Romero was Argentina's starting goalkeeper at the 2014 FIFA World Cup. In the semi-final, he earned himself Man of the Match by saving kicks from Ron Vlaar and Wesley Sneijder as Argentina defeated the Netherlands 42 in a penalty shootout to reach the 2014 FIFA World Cup Final. On 11 July, Romero was named on the three-man shortlist for FIFA's Golden Glove award for the tournament's best goalkeeper due to his performances that led his team to the final.
At the 2015 Copa Amrica, Romero saved from Juan Camilo Ziga in the penalty shoot-out at the end of Argentina's goalless quarter-final against Colombia in Via del Mar; although five takers did not score their penalties, this was the only save.


=== National team statistics ===


== Honours ==


=== Club ===
AZ
Eredivisie: 200809


=== International ===

Argentina U20
FIFA U-20 World Cup: 2007
Argentina U23
Olympic Gold Medal: 2008
Argentina
FIFA World Cup: Runner-up 2014
Copa Amrica: Runner-up 2015


== Personal life ==
Romero is married to model Eliana Guercio, with whom he has a daughter.


== References ==


== External links ==
Guardian statistics
Argentine Primera statistics (Spanish)
Sergio Romero career statistics at Soccerbase
Official website (Spanish)
Lega Serie A profile (Italian)Ander Herrera Agera (Spanish pronunciation: [ande erea awea]; born 14 August 1989) is a Spanish professional footballer who plays as a central midfielder for English club Manchester United. He began his career at Real Zaragoza before moving to his home-town club Athletic Bilbao in 2011, and then to Manchester United for 36 million in 2014. He has also won tournaments with Spain at Under-20 and Under-21 level and represented the nation at the 2012 Olympics.


== Club career ==


=== Real Zaragoza ===
Born in Bilbao, Herrera began his football career at Real Zaragoza, and made his professional debut in the Segunda Divisin in the 200809 season. He made 19 appearances that season as the Aragonese club made an immediate return to La Liga. He made his top-flight debut on 29 August 2009, in a 10 home win against CD Tenerife.
During the 200910 campaign, Herrera was one of Zaragoza's most used players as the club managed to retain its top-flight status. He scored his first league goal on 6 December, but in a 41 away defeat to RCD Mallorca.
In 201011, Herrera continued to feature regularly for Zaragoza, under both Jos Aurelio Gay and his successor Javier Aguirre.


=== Athletic Bilbao ===
On 7 February 2011, he agreed to join his home-town club Athletic Bilbao on a five-year contract for a reported 7.5 million effective as of 1 July. Buyout clauses were set at 36 million in his first three seasons and 40 million in the remainder.
Herrera made his official debut for Athletic on 18 August 2011, playing the full 90 minutes in a 00 home draw against Trabzonspor in the 201112 UEFA Europa League. He appeared in 54 official matches in his first year with the Basque club (four goals), who reached both the Copa del Rey and the Europa League finals.


=== Manchester United ===
Herrera was the subject of a 24 million offer from Manchester United in August 2013, but the bid was rejected by Athletic Bilbao. A year later, Manchester United tried to sign him again. On 26 June 2014, Athletic Bilbao announced on their official website that they had rejected a 36 million (28.85 million) bid from Manchester United for Herrera. Athletic Bilbao later confirmed that Herrera had activated his buyout clause, allowing United to sign him. Manchester United announced on the same day they had completed the signing of Herrera on a four-year contract pending the receipt of an International Transfer Certificate.


==== 201415 season ====
Herrera made his Manchester United debut on 23 July 2014 in the first match of the club's pre-season tour of the United States, playing the full 90 minutes and making three assists in the 70 win over LA Galaxy. His competitive debut came in the opening game of the Premier League season on 16 August, a 21 home defeat to Swansea City. He played 67 minutes before being substituted for Marouane Fellaini. Herrera picked up an injury during training and missed Manchester United's next two games against Sunderland and Burnley. In his first game back after returning from injury, against Queens Park Rangers on 14 September 2014, he scored his first goal for the club and made an assist as Manchester United won the game 4-0. He scored again in United's next game, flicking in ngel Di Mara's shot with his backheel in their 53 defeat to newly promoted Leicester City on 21 September.
Herrera provided an assist to Van Persie against Hull City on 29 November in a 30 win and was then awarded man of the match for his brilliant performance. He provided another assist to Marouane Fellani in a 21 win against Stoke City on 2 December 2014. Herrera scored his first FA Cup goal with a dipping effort in a third round tie against Yeovil Town on 4 January 2015. Herrera followed his cup goal against Yeovil with an important equalising goal against Preston North End in the FA Cup fifth round; United would go on to win the tie 31 and progress to the quarter final stage. Herrera started a Premier League game for the first time since 2 December against Swansea City, scoring United's only goal  his fifth of the season  in a 21 defeat. On 22 March 2015, he provided an assist for Juan Mata's goal in a 21 win over Liverpool. The following fixture, Herrera scored the first brace of his career to help United beat Aston Villa 31; he was also named man of the match for his performances.
Herrera's style of play led to comparisons with former United legend Paul Scholes, and was praised by the man himself as United's best signing.


== International career ==

Herrera was a member of the Spain Under-20 squad which won gold in football at the 2009 Mediterranean Games in Pescara, Italy.
Herrera was selected by Spanish under-21 coach Luis Milla to the 2011 UEFA European Championship in Denmark. On 12 June, in the group stage opener against England, he scored a controversial goal in an eventual 11 draw.
In the final against Switzerland, through another header, Herrera netted the first goal in an eventual 20 win in Aarhus.


== Club statistics ==
As of match played on 24 May 2015.


== Honours ==


=== International ===
Spain U21
UEFA European Under-21 Championship: 2011
Spain U20
Mediterranean Games: 2009


=== Individual ===
2011 UEFA European Under-21 Championship Team of the Tournament


== Personal life ==
Herrera's father, Pedro Mara, was also a footballer and a midfielder. He too played for Zaragoza (in a total of three professional clubs), where he also served as general manager.


== References ==


== External links ==
Athletic Bilbao profile
BDFutbol profile
Ander Herrera  FIFA competition recordLuke Paul Hoare Shaw (born 12 July 1995) is an English professional footballer who plays as a left-back for Manchester United and the England national team.
Originally a member of Southampton's youth system, Shaw made his first-team debut for the club in January 2012, and signed his first professional contract in May that year before becoming a regular in the Southampton team over the next two seasons. In 2014, Shaw was signed by Manchester United for 30 million, a world record transfer fee for a teenager, which was previously held by Wayne Rooney, when he transferred to Manchester United 10 years earlier.
On 5 March 2014, he made his senior international debut for the England team in a 10 friendly win against Denmark, and later that year was selected in the squad for the FIFA World Cup.


== Early life ==
Shaw was born in Kingston upon Thames, London, and attended Rydens Enterprise School in Hersham, Surrey. He grew up as a Chelsea supporter, and has claimed that he originally wanted to play for the London club. As an eight-year-old Shaw played at Chelsea's development centre in Guildford, but was not offered an academy place.


== Club career ==


=== Southampton ===
Shaw joined the Southampton Academy at the age of eight, and became a regular in the under-18 team from the age of 15. His first association with the first team came in September 2011, when he was featured as an unused substitute in a League Cup game against Preston North End, assigned the squad number 34. During the January 2012 transfer window, it was reported that Premier League clubs Arsenal, Chelsea, and Manchester City had shown interest in signing 16-year-old Shaw, with the then-Championship club reportedly valuing the defender at 4 million. Southampton quickly responded to such claims though, with then-manager Nigel Adkins assuring the media that "Luke Shaw is a big part of our future plans", and claiming that the club had "no intention ... of letting any of [their] young players move on".
At the age of 16, Shaw made his debut for the Southampton first team on 28 January 2012 in the FA Cup, replacing winger Jason Puncheon for the final 13 minutes of the third round tie against Millwall which finished 11. Following the club's promotion to the top flight in May 2012, Shaw was one of four youth players offered a professional contract for their return to the Premier League, along with Jack Stephens, Calum Chambers, and James Ward-Prowse.


==== 201213 season ====
The defender made his first start for the Southampton first team in August 2012, playing the full 90 minutes of a 41 win over Stevenage in the League Cup, and on 10 November he became the youngest Southampton player to start a game in the Premier League when he was chosen to play at left-back against Swansea City, completing 74 minutes of the 11 draw.
Shaw continued to make regular appearances throughout the season, and in manager Nigel Adkins's final game as Southampton manager on 16 January 2013 he set up the second goal in a 22 draw away to Chelsea, providing a cross from the left wing for Jason Puncheon to convert in the 75th minute. In an away game against Norwich City in March, Shaw was involved in a collision with striker Grant Holt which resulted in conceding a penalty in the first minute of injury time at the end of the game, although ultimately Artur Boruc saved the spot kick and the match ended goalless. He finished his first professional season with 28 appearances for Southampton, including 25 in the Premier League.


==== 201314 season ====

On 12 July, his 18th birthday, he signed a new five-year deal with Southampton. Shaw scored one goal during Southampton's pre-season preparations, scoring the last in an 80 win over Spanish side Palams on 20 July.
In the first game of the 201314 season, Shaw was directly involved in the goal that saw Southampton win against West Bromwich Albion when he was fouled in the penalty area by Youssouf Mulumbu in the 89th minute, with Rickie Lambert converting the resulting spot kick to see the Saints edge victory.
On 18 April 2014, he was named as one of the six players on the shortlist for the PFA Young Player of the Year award. He was also selected as left back in the PFA Team of the Year 2013-14.


=== Manchester United ===
On 27 June 2014, Shaw signed a four-year contract (with an option to extend for a further year) with Manchester United, for an undisclosed fee thought to be in the region of 30 million, becoming the most expensive teenager in world football. Chelsea were also interested in Shaw, but they backed away from a deal fearing the teenager's excessive pay demands would cause friction in their dressing room.


==== 201415 season ====
He made his debut in the first match of the club's pre-season tour of the United States, playing the first 45 minutes of a 70 win over LA Galaxy. Before the start of the season, he suffered a hamstring injury which ruled him out for a month. Shaw was named as a United substitute for the first time on 14 September in their fourth league match, and was unused as they recorded their first victory of the season against Queens Park Rangers. After again being an unused substitute in the subsequent defeat to Leicester City, Shaw made his competitive debut for United on 27 September, playing the entirety of a 21 home victory against West Ham United.
Shaw was nominated in late October for the Golden Boy 2014 Award, a prize given to the player considered to be Europe's best young player.
On 8 February 2015, Shaw was sent off after receiving a second yellow card during a 11 draw with West Ham. On 18 April, Shaw made his return to the starting line-up, replacing the injured Daley Blind. His first match since 9 March ended in a 10 defeat to league leaders Chelsea, but Shaw put up a solid performance, and was praised by captain Wayne Rooney.


== International career ==
Shaw's first experience of international football came in 2011, when he made six appearances for the England under-16 team. He made his debut against Slovenia in February, before competing in the Montaigu Tournament in April and scoring his first international goal against Uruguay at the tournament. He later made his debut for the under-17 team in August against Italy, and played in eight matches in a seven-month stint with the national side.
In January 2013, Shaw was set to be called up for the first time to the England under-21 team for the following month's friendly against Sweden, with then-manager Stuart Pearce calling the Southampton defender "an outstanding talent". Unfortunately though, due to an injury picked up in training, he was later forced to pull out of the game. The uncapped defender was subsequently called up for games against Romania on 21 March, Austria on 25 March, and Scotland on 13 August, as well as the UEFA European Under-21 Championship, all of which he had to pull out of for the same reason. He eventually made his England under-21 debut on 5 September when the team faced Moldova in a 2015 UEFA European Under-21 Championship qualification match, and he also played the full 90 minutes of England's second qualification game against Finland on 9 September.
On 27 February 2014, Shaw was called up to the England senior side for the first time, for their friendly with Denmark. He made his debut in the game, replacing Ashley Cole at half-time. England won the game 10.
On 12 May 2014, Shaw was named in Roy Hodgson's 23-man squad for the 2014 FIFA World Cup. He was included at the expense of the experienced Cole, who retired from internationals as a result. Shaw was England's second-choice left-back behind Leighton Baines, and made his tournament debut in the last group game, a 00 draw with Costa Rica in Belo Horizonte. Shaw also holds the accolade of being the youngest player to appear at the 2014 tournament.


== Style of play ==
As a left-back with a tendency to play attacking football, Shaw has been compared to former Southampton youth product Gareth Bale, with particular focus being placed on his speed, decision-making, and defending skills. Former England international and FA Director of Football Development Trevor Brooking has described Shaw as "technically very gifted".


== Career statistics ==


=== Club ===
As of match played on 9 May 2015.


=== International ===
As of match played 18 November 2014.


== Honours ==


=== Individual ===
PFA Premier League Team of the Year: 201314


== References ==


== External links ==
Southampton F.C. profile
Manchester United F.C. profile
ESPN profile
Luke Shaw career statistics at Soccerbase
Luke Shaw England profile at EnglandstatsLuis Antonio Valencia Mosquera, commonly known as Antonio Valencia (Spanish pronunciation: [antonjo alensja]; born 4 August 1985), is an Ecuadorian footballer who plays as a right winger for Manchester United and the Ecuador national team. He has also played as a right-back during his career.
After progressing through the youth system at El Nacional, Valencia became a first team regular and made over 80 appearances for the club before signing for La Liga side Villarreal in 2005. He only made two league appearances for the Spanish side in between successful loan spells at Recreativo de Huelva for the 200506 season and later English Premier League club Wigan Athletic from 2006 to 2008. Wigan later signed Valencia on a three-year deal for an undisclosed fee in January 2008. His performances for Wigan soon attracted attention from several high profile clubs, eventually signing for Manchester United in June 2009. Valencia has since won the 200910 Football League Cup, the 2010 FA Community Shield, the 201011 Premier League and the 201213 Premier League during his time at Manchester United, along with being voted into PFA Team of the Year in his debut season.
Valencia made his Ecuador debut in 2005 and scored two goals in the process. He represented his country at the 2006 FIFA World Cup, the 2007 Copa Amrica, the 2011 Copa Amrica and the 2014 FIFA World Cup. Since making his debut, Valencia has won 72 caps and scored eight goals for his country.


== Early life ==
Valencia was born on 4 August 1985 in Lago Agrio, near the city of Nueva Loja, Ecuador, which is located in the Amazon rainforest. Valencia helped his mother sell drinks outside the stadium of his local club at Lago Agrio and would then search for empty bottles for his father to sell to a bottle-deposit in the capital, Quito. Valencia used to play barefoot on the pitch next to the bungalow he shared with his parents, five brothers and sister.
When Valencia was aged 11, scout Pedro "Papi" Perlaza spotted him playing on a dusty field near his home, and signed him to the local FA-run sports academy in Sucumbos. At the age of 16, Valencia didn't tell his father he left home to take up an offer to play for El Nacional, the military-backed club in Quito. Nobody knew about Valencias decision, except his mother and his elder brother, Carlos Alfredo, who paid the fare for his eight-hour bus journey. Valencia began in central midfield and on a salary of 50 dollars a month.


== Club career ==


=== El Nacional ===
Valencia started his career at El Nacional and within a year, he was fast-tracked into the Under 20s, where he played alongside striker Christian "Chucho" Bentez and scored 11 goals in 84 matches. Valencia made his debut for El Nacional alonsgside his idol dison Mndez. Valencia won his first club title as part of the El Nacional team that won the 2005 Clausura Tournament, earning him the attention of both the national football team's manager and Spanish clubs.


=== Villarreal and Recreativo ===
Valencia moved to Spanish club Villarreal in 2005. After failing to break into the first-team, however, he was loaned to Recreativo de Huelva to gain experience. Valencia helped Recreativo gain promotion to La Liga as they finished the season top of the table.


=== Wigan Athletic ===

On 3 August 2006, Valencia joined English Premier League club Wigan Athletic, initially on a year-long loan deal. He made his debut for Wigan on 19 August, in a 21 loss away to Newcastle United. His first goal for Wigan came in a 40 home win over Manchester City on 21 October. Valencia returned after a three-month absence as he played 78 minutes of a 20 home loss to Everton on 21 January 2007. Valencia was sent off for the first time for Wigan on 9 April, receiving a straight red card for a two-footed challenge on Wilfred Bouma during a 11 away draw against Aston Villa. Valencia ended his first season with one goal, one assist and one red card in his 22 appearances.
The loan was extended into the following season, and on 18 January 2008, he transferred for an undisclosed fee, signing a three-and-a-half-year contract. The deal was said to be worth around 5 million. Valencia scored his first goal of the 200708 season in a 20 win over Derby County on 23 February, before netting his first Wigan brace in a 20 away victory over Aston Villa on 3 May. Valencia ended the season with three goals and three assists in 32 appearances in all competitions.
Valencia's first goal of the following season came in Wigan's 50 away victory over Hull City on 30 August. He then grabbed a goal in the 21 home win over Manchester City on 28 September, but followed it up by receiving a red card in the 32 loss at Liverpool on 18 October. Valencia scored his final goal for Wigan on 13 December, as he inspired them to a 30 victory over Blackburn Rovers. Wigan boss Steve Bruce confirmed that Valencia turned down the chance to join Real Madrid in January 2009. On 9 February, Valencia was ruled out of action for three weeks after suffering a recurrence of a hamstring injury. In early June 2009, Wigan chairman Dave Whelan announced that he would not force Valencia to stay at the club. Valencia scored seven goals in 88 appearances during his time at Wigan.


=== Manchester United ===


==== 20092011 ====
On 30 June 2009, Valencia became Manchester United's first summer signing, having cut his holiday short to have a medical with the club. He signed a four-year contract for an undisclosed fee, rumoured to be in the region of 16 million.
On 29 July, he made his debut for United and scored his first goal in the process, netting United's second in a 21 pre-season victory over Boca Juniors in the Audi Cup. He made his competitive debut for Manchester United in the 2009 FA Community Shield, when he came on for the injured Nani in the 62nd minute. On 17 October, he scored his first competitive goal for the club, scoring United's second in a 21 league victory against Bolton Wanderers. His first UEFA Champions League goal followed four days later in a 10 away victory against CSKA Moscow.
Valencia provided the assist for Wayne Rooney's winning goal in the 2010 League Cup Final against Aston Villa on 28 February 2010, Valencia was named Man of the Match as United won 21. On 25 April, Valencia was included in the PFA Premier League Team of the Year in his debut season for the club alongside teammates Patrice Evra, Darren Fletcher, and Wayne Rooney.

On 8 August, Valencia scored United's first goal in their 31 win over Chelsea in the 2010 Community Shield. During a Champions League game against Rangers on 14 September, Valencia suffered a break to his left ankle. An operation the morning after the match showed that his left ankle was fractured and dislocated, and that his ankle ligaments were damaged. On 28 February 2011, Valencia returned to training with Manchester United's first-team.
He played his first game back from injury against Arsenal in the FA Cup sixth round on 12 March 2011. On 9 April, he scored his first league goal of the season as he netted the second of a 20 home win over Fulham. Days later, he scored the first goal in United's 41 victory against the German team Schalke 04 in the second leg of the semifinal of the 201011 UEFA Champions League, game in which he was selected as player of the match. On 14 May, he became the first Ecuadorian player to win the English Premier League in the 201011 season. Valencia was a starter in United's 31 Champions League Final defeat to FC Barcelona, preferred instead of Nani in the line-up at Wembley Stadium.


==== 201112 season ====
On 1 August 2011, Valencia agreed a new four-year deal with Manchester United that will keep him at the club until the summer of 2015. Prior to the start of the 201112 season, Valencia picked up an ankle injury on international duty with Ecuador at the Copa Amrica during the summer. He missed United's entire pre-season tour of the United States because of the injury. He also missed the first month of the season because of a lack of match fitness. Valencia made his first start of the season away at Benfica in the first group stage match of the UEFA Champions League. On 18 September 2011, he returned to Premier League action, replacing the injured Chris Smalling at right back in the 31 win against Chelsea. He then continued to play right back in the next three games against Leeds United in the League Cup, away at Stoke City, and home against Norwich City in the Premier League. Valencia scored his first goal of the season, in a fourth round League Cup tie against Aldershot Town, receiving the ball in the middle of the park and then turning and firing in from 25-yards to seal a 30 victory.
Valencia scored his second goal of the season, the opening goal in Manchester United's Champions League fixture against Oelul Galai. The game finished 20. On 26 December 2011, Valencia scored the fourth goal for Manchester United in a 50 home win against Wigan Athletic. He received the ball on the right hand edge of the penalty area and rifled a shot across goal and into the far corner. On 22 January 2012, Valencia scored the first goal against Arsenal with a header, before later setting up Danny Welbeck to win the game 21. On 2 April 2012, in his 100th appearance for the club in all competitions, Valencia scored the first goal in a 20 win against Blackburn Rovers, which many experts said was "like Roberto Carlos," as Valencia cut into the box and scored by curling the ball around Paul Robinson and going into his far post. Five minutes later, Valencia set up the second goal to Ashley Young, who spun around the defender and curl the ball inside the bottom corner. Valencia was also chosen as man of the match for his role in the game.
Valencia received the Manchester United fans' and players' player of the year award and award for goal of the season award, for his goal against Blackburn Rovers.


==== 201213 season ====

On 3 July 2012, it was confirmed that Valencia would wear the number 7 shirt, worn by past players such as Johnny Berry, Steve Coppell, Bryan Robson, Eric Cantona, David Beckham and Cristiano Ronaldo, after Sir Alex Ferguson offered the number upon Michael Owen's departure from the club due to Valencia's great form and season. The number 25 shirt was given to Valencia's new team-mate Nick Powell. On 17 April 2013, Valencia scored his first league goal of the season, against West Ham United. On 22 April, Valencia won his second Premier League title after Manchester United defeated Aston Villa in a 30 home win.


==== 201314 season ====
After an indifferent 201213 season wearing the number 7 shirt, Valencia returned to his former number 25 shirt. Valencia started the season with a goal against Sevilla FC in Rio Ferdinand's testimonial at Old Trafford in a 13 defeat on 9 August 2013. Valencia subsequently appeared in the Community Shield against Wigan coming on as a substitute for Wilfried Zaha in the 62nd minute.Valencia started the Champions League campaign with a goal against Bayer Leverkusen the fourth in a 4-2 home victory as well as giving Robin Van Persie an assist for the first on that night on 18 September 2013. Valencia got his first goal of the Premier League season against Fulham on 2 November 2013, the first in a 3-1 away win. Valencia scored the first goal in the away fixture 50 victory to Manchester United against Bayer Leverkusen in the group stage of Champions League on 27 November 2013. Bringing his Champions League goal tally to 8 goals. On 11 January 2014, Valencia scored in the 47th minute against Swansea City in a 2-0 home win. On 21 June 2014, Valencia signed a three-year contract extension that will keep him at the club until 2018.


== International career ==


=== Ecuador U20 ===

Valencia was fast tracked through the under-20 team, alongside Christian Bentez, where he scored 17 goals in 23 matches.


=== Ecuador senior team ===
On 27 March 2005, Valencia's gained his first international cap for Ecuador and netted his first two international goals in the process, coming in a 52 World Cup qualifying win against Paraguay. Three days later he scored again in a qualifying match, this time netting in 22 draw away to Peru. Valencia played in all of Ecuador's 2006 FIFA World Cup matches, and was chosen as a nominee for FIFA's ideal 11 team, which recognises the top stars for every position in the World Cup. He was also shortlisted as one of the six potential candidates for the Gillette Best Young Player award. An email broadly circulated in England encouraged votes for Valencia, in an attempt to prevent Cristiano Ronaldo from winning. Valencia ended up receiving the greatest number of votes in the online poll, but since the award's winner is determined by a combination of the fan vote and a judging panel, the award was eventually given to Lukas Podolski.
On 27 June 2007, Valencia netted Ecuador's first goal of their 2007 Copa Amrica campaign, however they eventually lost the match 32 to Chile and finished the tournament bottom of their group. Valenica received hs first red card for Ecuador on 12 October 2008, during a 10 victory over Chile in a World Cup qualifier. On 9 September 2009, Valencia scored his first World Cup qualifying goal, netting in a 31 away victory over Bolivia. On 10 October 2009, he netted for the second qualifier in a row, this time netting Ecuador's single goal in a 21 defeat to the hands of Uruguay.
On 3 July 2011, in a match against Paraguay at the 2011 Copa Amrica, he suffered a sprained left ankle and was forced off at half-time.
In June 2014, Valenica was named in Ecuador's squad for the 2014 FIFA World Cup. In a preparation match, he captained the team to a 22 draw with England at the Sun Life Stadium in Miami. During the match, he was fouled by Raheem Sterling and responded by shoving Sterling and grabbing him by the throat. Referee Jair Marrufo decided to send off both Valencia and Sterling. Valencia later apologized for his reaction.
Valencia captained La Tri during all three of their matches at the World Cup and was sent off for a foul on Lucas Digne during their final game against France, a goalless draw at the Maracan which saw his team eliminated. He missed the 2015 Copa Amrica in Chile due to urgent ankle surgery.


== Career statistics ==


=== Club ===
Statistics accurate as of 24 May 2015.


== Honours ==


=== Club ===
Manchester United
Premier League (2): 201011, 201213
UEFA Champions League Runner-up: 201011
Football League Cup (1): 200910
FA Community Shield (2): 2010, 2013


=== Individual ===
Alan Hardaker Trophy (1): 2010
PFA Premier League Team of the Year (1): 200910
Sir Matt Busby Player of the Year (1): 201112
Manchester United Players' Player of the Year (1): 201112
Manchester United Goal of the Year (1): 201112


== Personal life ==
Valencia and his wife, Zoila, have a daughter named Domenica, who was born during the 2006 World Cup finals. Along with former Wigan teammates Maynor Figueroa and Wilson Palacios, Valencia began taking English lessons (although Valencia still requires an interpreter). Whilst at Wigan his English lessons would be once a week, however since his move to Manchester United they are sometimes everyday. Former Manchester United manager Sir Alex Ferguson described Valencia as a quiet and shy boy. His older brother, der, is also a professional footballer playing for Independiente Jos Tern in Ecuador.


== Notes ==
^ Includes other competitive competitions, including the FA Community Shield, UEFA Super Cup, FIFA Club World Cup


== References ==


== External links ==
Luis Antonio Valencia career statistics at Soccerbase
Luis Valencia  FIFA competition record
Antonio Valencia profile at the Manchester United websiteBastian Schweinsteiger (pronounced [bastian vanta]) (born 1 August 1984) is a German professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for English club Manchester United and the Germany national team. A right-footed player, he usually plays as central midfielder. Earlier in his career, he primarily played as a wide midfielder. On 2 September 2014, Schweinsteiger was named captain of the national team following Philipp Lahm's international retirement.
He spent 13 seasons at Bayern Munich, playing in exactly 500 matches across all competitions and scoring 67 goals. His honours at the club include eight Bundesliga titles, seven DFB-Pokal titles, a UEFA Champions League title, a FIFA Club World Cup title and two DFB-Ligapokals. He joined Manchester United in 2015.
Since making his international debut in 2004, he has earned over 100 caps for Germany, scoring 23 goals. He was selected in their squads for three European Championships and as many World Cups, including their victory at the 2014 FIFA World Cup.


== Club career ==


=== Bayern Munich ===
Schweinsteiger signed with Bayern Munich as a youth team player on 1 July 1998 and rose through the club's youth sides. A talented youth ski racer, he had to decide between pursuing a professional career in skiing or one in football. Having won the German youth championship in July 2002, Schweinsteiger quickly earned a place in the reserves, producing a string of solid third division displays. He initially earned a reputation for being a rebel off the pitch, making headlines for the wrong reasons but has since settled down.
During his first appearances in the titular eleven, he played left-back. After just two training sessions with the first team, coach Ottmar Hitzfeld gave Schweinsteiger his debut, at the age of 18, as a late substitute in a UEFA Champions League game against RC Lens in November 2002, and the youngster made an immediate impact, creating a goal for Markus Feulner within minutes. He signed a professional contract the following month and went on to appear in 14 Bundesliga games in 200203, helping Bayern to a league and cup double. The next season he played 26 Bundesliga games. He scored his first Bayern goal against VfL Wolfsburg in September 2003.
Surprisingly sent back to Bayern's reserve team by new coach Felix Magath at the beginning of the 200506 season despite his international exploits of the summer in the Confederations Cup, Schweinsteiger swiftly returned to play a role in the double-winning campaign and scored in Bayern's Champions League quarter-final first-leg defeat at Chelsea.
Over the next three seasons, up until the end of 200708, Schweinsteiger made 135 appearances in all competitions for Bayern Munich (Champions League, Bundesliga and DFB-Pokal), scoring 10 goals in the process.
On 15 August 2008, Schweinsteiger scored the first Bundesliga goal of the 200809 season. In December 2010, he extended his contract with Bayern until 2016.

On 25 April 2012, Schweinsteiger scored from the last and match-clinching penalty kick against Real Madrid to send Bayern through to the 2012 UEFA Champions League Final, where they would face Chelsea. The match, played at Bayern's Allianz Arena, ended 11 and went to a penalty shoot-out. With the shoot-out poised at 33, Schweinsteiger's effort was saved by Petr Cech. Didier Drogba then scored his penalty to seal the title for Chelsea.
In the 201213 season, Schweinsteiger performed considerably well, continuing his duties as central midfielder along with new signing Javi Martnez. On 6 April 2013, Schweinsteiger scored a backheel flick goal against Eintracht Frankfurt which sealed the Bundesliga title for Bayern. The season ended on a high for Schweinsteiger, as Bayern secured a treble of Bundesliga, DFB-Pokal and Champions League.
Schweinsteiger received the 2013 German player of the year due to his performance for Bayern Munich. He was described by then manager Jupp Heynckes as the best midfielder in the world and Heynckes wanted either Schweinsteiger, Ribry or Thomas Mller to win the Ballon d'Or. After the treble-winning season with Bayern in 201213, Schweinsteiger has impressed new manager Pep Guardiola with his passing, work rate, assists and terrific long shots.
He scored an equaliser goal in match against Manchester United in the first leg of their 201314 UEFA Champions League quarter-final at Old Trafford but saw a red card after that.
He made his 201415 season debut in a 40 win against 1899 Hoffenheim. He came in for Mario Gtze in the 78th minute. On 16 May 2015, with Bayern having already won the league, he scored the opening goal in a 21 defeat at SC Freiburg. On 23 May 2015, Schweinsteiger scored on his 500th appearance for Bayern. This proved to be his last match. He transferred to Manchester United on 13 July 2015. He had been at Bayern for 17 years.


=== Manchester United ===

On 13 July 2015, Manchester United completed the signing of Schweinsteiger on a three-year contract for an undisclosed fee, reported as between 15 million (10.6 million) and 14.4 million. Manchester United had never before fielded a German in the first team; Markus Neumayr and Ron-Robert Zieler were at the club before him, but neither made it into the first team.
Schweinsteiger made his pre-season debut for Manchester United in a friendly match against Club Amrica on 17 July 2015. United defeated the Mexican club 10 in Seattle.


== International career ==
Schweinsteiger made his international debut in 2004 in a friendly against Hungary. As of 14 July 2014, Schweinsteiger has been capped 108 times and has scored 23 goals for the Germany national football team since making his debut in 2004. He has also been to all major tournaments with the German squad UEFA Euro 2004 in Portugal.


=== Euro 2004 ===
Right after taking part in the under-21s' disappointing run at the 2004 European Championships, he was called up for Euro 2004. Bayern's number 31 earned rave reviews for his performances in Portugal, showing combative skills and even setting up the opening goal for former Bayern team-mate Michael Ballack in Germany's 21 loss against the Czech Republic.


=== 2006 FIFA World Cup ===
He scored his first two international goals on 8 June 2005 against Russia and scored his first goal in a competitive match against Tunisia on 18 June 2005 at the Confederations Cup in Germany. He was called up to the 2006 FIFA World Cup on home soil and shot into prominence at the tournament with his two brilliant long-range strikes in the third place match against Portugal, which won him the Man of the Match award. The match ended 31 with the 21-year-old nearly claiming a hat-trick but his deflected free kick was credited as an own-goal to Armando Petit.
At the age of 22, he had already played 41 matches for the German national team, a record for any German player at the time. This record was soon broken, however, by Lukas Podolski who was capped 44 times at the age of 22. At the same age, Lothar Matthus (the German all-time record holder with 150 caps) had only played 13 times for the German national team.


=== Euro 2008 ===

During Euro 2008 qualifiers, he scored two goals en route to a record 130 win over San Marino in San Marino. He scored the third goal in Germany's 41 win over Slovakia in Bratislava.
Schweinsteiger lost his place in the starting eleven when manager Joachim Lw moved striker Lukas Podolski to his usual position on the left wing to accommodate the strike partnership of Miroslav Klose and Mario Gmez, and he made two substitute appearances in the group stages. In the second match against Croatia, he was shown a straight red card for reacting to a challenge from Jerko Leko as Germany succumbed to a 21 shock defeat. After serving his suspension by missing the game against Austria, he returned to the starting line-up in the quarter-final against Portugal, as Lw reverted to the old 442 formation when Gmez was benched after failing to make an impression. Once again he was instrumental in Germany's 32 win, scoring one goal and setting up the other two. He also scored his country's first goal in the 32 semi-final victory against Turkey. He captained the team for the first time in a friendly against the United Arab Emirates.


=== 2010 FIFA World Cup ===
Schweinsteiger featured often in 2010 World Cup qualifying, playing nine of the 10 games and contributing three goals. He started in Germany's third pre-warm up game vs. Bosnia on 3 June 2010, and scored two penalties in a 31 victory in the space of four minutes, but in the 87th minute he was substituted off for Bayern Munich team-mate Toni Kroos.
During the 2010 FIFA World Cup, Schweinsteiger was charged with replacing the injured Michael Ballack at the centre of midfield. He performed admirably in this role, adding valuable leadership and international experience to a very young German side. He was vital to both the German attack and defence, as was apparent when he was named the Man of the Match after the quarter-final match against Argentina, where he provided two assists while also managing to contain Lionel Messi. Germany subsequently lost to Spain in the semi-finals. Germany was able to rally for a 32 victory over Uruguay in the third place match, and, with Philipp Lahm resting on the bench because of illness, Schweinsteiger served as captain.
Overall, Schweinsteiger recorded three assists in seven matches in South Africa, which tied him for the most assists in the finals with Dirk Kuyt, Kak, Thomas Mller and Mesut zil. In recognition of his excellent play throughout the tournament, he was chosen as one of 10 finalists for the prestigious Golden Ball, awarded to the most outstanding player of the tournament.


=== Euro 2012 ===

Schweinsteiger established himself as first choice as defensive midfielder in Germany's qualifying group. He played five matches  once against each opponent: Belgium, Azerbaijan, Kazakhstan, Austria and Turkey  and helped Germany win 10 out of 10 games, scoring once and providing one assist.
Schweinsteiger started all five of Germany's matches at the UEFA Euro 2012 finals and assisted both of Mario Gmez goals in the 21 Group B win over rivals the Netherlands.


=== 2014 FIFA World Cup ===

Schweinsteiger made five appearances as Germany qualified for the 2014 FIFA World Cup. On 15 October 2013, he won his 100th cap for the national team in a 53 win over Sweden.
After making a substitute appearance in the team's second match against Ghana, Schweinsteiger was selected to start in the third group game against the United States. He retained his place in the team for Germany's round of 16 match, a 21 win against Algeria. He was instrumental in the World Cup finals against Argentina and led the mid-field with sweeping passes for the German attack. Germany won the World Cup final 10 through Mario Gtze's 113th minute goal.


=== Euro 2016 ===
Prior to the start of qualification, Schweinsteiger was appointed as the new captain for Germany after Lahm's retirement. He made his first appearance in qualification in a 20 win against Georgia.


== Style of play ==
Schweinsteiger largely operates in the centre, but he is versatile enough to provide an option on the wing, either left or right. He is regarded as one of the best midfielders in the world. Schweinsteiger possesses a fearsome shot from range as well as a wicked delivery from set-pieces and his boundless energy serves him well. Dubbed the "Midfield Motor", Schweinsteiger is also a superb reader of the game and has scored spectacularly due to his good positioning. He has been called "the brain" of the German national team by his coach Joachim Lw. He has been voted as the best German player in 2013. He is also known as the "midfield mastermind".


== Personal life ==
Schweinsteiger's fans refer to him as "Schweini" or "Basti" to distinguish him from his elder brother, Tobias, a professional footballer who also plays for Bayern, albeit in the reserve team. Schweinsteiger was in a relationship with model Sarah Brandner from 2007 until July 2014. They lived in Munich together. He is currently dating Serbian tennis player Ana Ivanovic. Schweinsteiger is Roman Catholic.


== Career statistics ==


=== Club ===
As of 13 July 2015
1.^ Statistics includes DFL-Supercup.


== Honours ==


=== Club ===
Bayern Munich Junior Team
Under 17 Bundesliga: 2001
Under 19 Bundesliga: 2002
Bayern Munich II
Regionalliga Sd: 200304
Bayern Munich
Bundesliga: 200203, 200405, 200506, 200708, 200910, 201213, 201314, 201415
DFB-Pokal: 200203, 200405, 200506, 200708, 200910, 201213, 201314
DFB-Ligapokal: 2004, 2007
DFL-Supercup: 2010, 2012
UEFA Champions League: 201213
UEFA Super Cup: 2013
FIFA Club World Cup: 2013


=== International ===
Germany
FIFA World Cup: 2014
FIFA World Cup Third Place: 2006, 2010
FIFA Confederations Cup Third Place: 2005
UEFA European Football Championship: Runner-up 2008, Third Place 2012


=== Individual ===
Silbernes Lorbeerblatt: 2006, 2010, 2014
FIFA World Cup Dream Team: 2010
FIFA World Cup Most assists: 2010 (3, shared with Thomas Mller, Mesut zil, Kak, and Dirk Kuyt)
ESM Team of the Year: 201213
Footballer of the Year in Germany: 2013
UEFA Best Player in Europe Award: 2013 (7th place)


== References ==


== External links ==
Official website (German)
Bastian Schweinsteiger at FCBayern.de
Bastian Schweinsteiger at fussballdaten.de (German)
Bastian Schweinsteiger at Sportepoch.com
Bastian Schweinsteiger  FIFA competition record